Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
Number of Reviews
41

Author
Michael Dequina
I am not a "Trekker," so I was quite surprised by how much I enjoyed the
last big-screen installment of the long-running film and television
franchise, 1996's _Star_Trek:_First_Contact_.  Delivering thrills and a
terrific adversary (the menacing Borg race) for general audiences to chew
on, and enough of the trademark techno-talk to appease the geekiest of
Trekkers, director/co-star Jonathan Frakes had his cake and ate it too.
After _First_Contact_'s critical and popular success, it comes as no
surprise that Paramount and _Trek_ producer Rick Berman tapped Frakes to
helm _Trek_ movie#9, but not even he can break this series from its curious
"even/odd" curse--that is, even-numbered installments = good, odd = bad (or
at least not good).  To be fair, Frakes's direction is not the problem with
_Insurrection_--it's the weak script by Michael Piller, from a story Piller
co-devised with Berman.  This time out, Capt. Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick
Stewart), Commander Will Riker (Frakes), android Lt. Cmdr. Data (Brent
Spiner), Lt. Cmdr. Geordi LaForge (LeVar Burton), Dr. Beverly Crusher
(Gates McFadden), Counselor Deanna Troi (Marina Sirtis), and Michael Dorn's
Lt. Cmdr. Worf (again on loan from his current TV home on
_Star_Trek:_Deep_Space_Nine_) commit the titular act of insurrection
against their higher-ups at the Federation when they set out to protect the
population of a peaceful planet from a maniacal, Federation-allied alien
(F. Murray Abraham) determined to harness the planet's power of granting
perpetual youth.
_Insurrection_ is a far cry from the violent, "Resistance is futile" Borg
antics of _First_Contact_ in terms of action, excitement, and,
unfortunately, interest--to non-Trekkers, that is.  A lot of the time is
spent on light character moments, such as Data bonding with a
technology-fearing young boy, Riker and Troi rekindling their romance, and
Worf re-experiencing Klingon puberty, thanks to the perpetual youth bug.
Trekkers will eat that stuff up; others will be looking elsewhere for
something engaging, which cannot be found in the by-the-numbers story or
the incredibly boring villain.  What they will ultimately fix their
attention on is the always-commanding presence of Stewart and the typically
polished effects and makeup work.  Aside from that, this subpar outing has
nothing to offer anyone outside of the _Trek_ faithful.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@iname.com   |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com


Author
Mark O'Hara
A Film Review by Mark O'Hara
Visit Online Film Critics Society at http://www.ofcs.org
In time for Christmas we have the ninth 'Star Trek' feature, 
Insurrection, a picture that succeeds largely because of the risks it 
takes.  
In the opening shots we see the idyllic lifestyle of the Bak'u, a people 
who are dead ringers for Homo Sapiens, and who choose to exclude their 
advanced technology from their everyday existence.  (Have you noticed, 
by the way, that intermittent apostrophes in names give them a foreign 
smack?)  Thus there are blacksmiths and bakers and other artisans who 
wear costumes and live in a village reminiscent of the late Middle Ages.  
The set decoration resembles a resort, in fact, a place one might reach 
by a small craft across a man-made bay from Epcot Center.  It is the 
quaintest part of the movie.  Another aspect of the set that accents the 
film's action is the beauty of the planet;  similar to the forests in 
Return of the Jedi, these landscapes provide a natural backdrop in which 
the story unfolds.  The few deep space shots look wonderfully luminous, 
like the multi-colored photographs of gaseous formations sent back by 
the Hubble telescope.
A sudden intrusion on the simple routines of the Bak'u tells us trouble 
is afoot.  Data (Brent Spiner) has gone haywire, and anyone who knows 
'Trek' lore knows Data is an android with the strength of a backhoe.  
Quickly he thwarts the Federation lackeys who pursue him, and then 
uncloaks the spy-post occupied by none other than Starfleet Admiral 
Dougherty (Anthony Zerbe) and some loose-skinned species with whom 
Dougherty is in cahoots.  Soon we witness the re-assembly of the crew of 
the enterprise, whose mission is at first to capture Data.  When matters 
become more complicated, a restored Data, Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick 
Stewart) and a comely Bak'u woman named Anij (Donna Murphy) discover a 
holographic double of the Bak'u village.  It seems that this Admiral 
Dougherty has wheedled the leaders of the Federation into approving the 
evacuation of the Bak'u to another planet, in order to exploit a most 
unusual natural resource.  If carried out, these orders would of course 
violate the Prime Directive.  Will the principled Jean-Luc Picard permit 
these peaceable people to be displaced?
In the tradition of the best episodes of the series, Insurrection floats 
some worthwhile political ideas - a plotting strategy right out of Gene 
Roddenberry's notebooks.  The agenda of this installment attacks the 
relocation of native populations;  at no point does Picard mention 
Stalinist Russia or Nazi Germany, though the comparison comes across.  
So the central conflict of the film springs from a trusty, if 
unoriginal, premise, and director Jonathan Frakes - Cmdr. William T. 
Riker, the loyal 'Number One,' - moves the story engagingly while 
staging variations on familiar themes.  Michael Piller's screenplay is 
well edited, with punchy scene-closings and a few hearty chuckles, nods 
to comic relief generated by Worf's revisted puberty and Data's 
misinterpretation of references to boobs.  Pretty standard stuff, this, 
but it works again.
The villain's seat is occupied by F. Murray Abraham as Ru'afo, an angry 
alien who looks like a mummy with a steel plate in his head.  Abraham's 
makeup is actually a throwback to his Academy Award-winning role of 
Salieri in Amadeus, skin sagging in even greater folds and pouches.  
Ru'afo is moderately effective as a baddie;  it's just that he's mostly 
bark, the script not giving him the menacing bite given Christopher 
Plummer as a Klingon general in an earlier flick.  Not until we discover 
Ru'afo's history with the Bak'u does his character take on more mythical 
proportions of evil.
Once again Patrick Stewart plays a brave and noble captain.  His acting 
is probably the most transparent among the cast.  He makes us believe a 
60-ish action hero whose ethics and actions are beyond question.  Picard 
even gets a love interest in this episode - Anij, whose beauty belies 
her 300-plus age.  Unfortunately, the Captain gets no farther than 
hand-holding, though he promises to spend an upcoming 318-day leave with 
her.  Hints of a rekindled romance turn up repeatedly between Riker and 
the buxom Counselor Deanna Troi, though we do not see much consummation 
in this relationship, either.  (The dearth of affection is probably one 
cause for the PG rating, for which I am thankful;  my 10 year-old was 
able to attend with us when usually she misses 'Star Trek' 
installments.)
Music in Insurrection nicely compliments scenes that require it, giving 
the audience cues for climactic moments.  As I believe the makers of the 
'first' episode of 'Star Wars' are doing with John Williams' theme, the 
'Star Trek' people reuse the famous 'Next Generation' main theme, big on 
horns, at the end.
All the baloney about numerology aside, this odd-numbered 'Star Trek' is 
a solid entry in the series.  It is not as riveting as the last, First 
Contact, which featured the Borg, the worst cross you could imagine 
between zombies and vampires, and which was very heavy on technology and 
space exteriors.  By leaving this trend at least momentarily behind, 
Insurrection takes a chance on a slower pace and more character 
development.  Two decisions that, for my three and a half dollars, make 
for good entertainment.


Author
Victory Marasigan
Review by Victory A. Marasigan
http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~vmaras1/reviewsidx.html
It's hard to believe it's been nearly five years since "The Next
Generation" crew gave up their top-rated syndicated TV series "to explore
new worlds and new civilizations" on the big screen. What's not as
difficult to believe is the ebb of rich characterizations and fresh
storylines their infrequent adventures have necessitated. _Star Trek:
Insurrection_, the crew's third feature, sadly rings more like a _Return
to Mayberry_-type reunion than a thrilling further adventure.
This time around, the Enterprise and her crew must travel to a remote
planet, where one of their own has apparently gone renegade and taken
people hostage. Captain Picard (Patrick Stewart) and crew manage to subdue
their comrade and beam down to investigate, only to find a small colony of
youthful Ba'ku living in an eerily tranquil, unchanging paradise. The
actual threat to these humanoid people is a group of stretchy-faced aliens
called the Son'a (led by _Amadeus_' F. Murray Abraham) who, under the
sanction of the Federation, have devised a sneaky plan to steal the planet
-- and its rejuvenating resources -- right out from under the Ba'ku's
wrinkle-free noses. 
The planet's virtual Fountain of Youth is a thinly-veiled excuse to show
Our Gang acting uncharacteristically giddy and energetic, a la the
break-dancing old geezers in Cocoon. Counselor Troi and Commander Riker
(Marina Sirtis and director Jonathan Frakes)  rekindle their early TV
series romance. Worf (Michael Dorn) goes through Klingon puberty all over
again. Geordi LaForge (Levar Burton) gets to see for the first time. And
Picard finds love with a sweet (and improbably unattached) Ba'ku (Donna
Murphy). It's too bad the planet's powers can't work true miracles, like
subtracting the pounds some of the crew have gained during their two-year
hiatus (Is it just me, or is Commander Riker prematurely showing the
famous Captain Kirk lovehandles?). 
The temporary augmentations brought about by the planetary anomaly only
highlight a failure of the new movie voyages so far. After three films, no
major changes in the characters' lives have occurred, barring Picard's
Ahab-Moby Dick awakening in _First Contact_. Beloved personalities like
Troi and Worf have become mere caricatures of themselves. And the
pasty-white android Commander Data (Brent Spiner) has had nothing to do
but plod along and "discover" yet another strange facet of humanity -- in
this case the concept of adolescent fun (Really, after almost a decade on
the Enterprise, you'd think he'd have learned the meaning of "fun" long
ago).
Much of Insurrection's self-aware script plays off the fact that these
characters know each other so well, they can predict exactly what the
other is going to do in any given situation. Their familiarity with each
other is sort of a private joke, albeit one which seasoned viewers of the
series will eat up. It's all too apparent that writers Rick Berman and
Michael Piller were trying to duplicate the virtues of their last film,
the enjoyable _First Contact_. But all the eye-winking humor and
space-chase action they packed into this outing can't mask the fact that
the story is silly, dull, and ultimately inconsequential to the _Star
Trek_ mythos.  Unless the Enterprise breaks free of the orbit into which
it's currently locked, the hit-or-miss legacy of the franchise will likely
continue. 
Reviewed December 9, 1998 at RC Eastpoint, Baltimore, MD. 

Author
Scott Renshaw
STAR TREK: INSURRECTION
(Paramount)
Starring:  Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar Burton,
Michael Dorn, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis, F. Murray Abraham.
Screenplay:  Michael Piller.
Producer:  Rick Berman.
Director:  Jonathan Frakes.
MPAA Rating:  PG (profanity, violence)
Running Time:  101 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     By now, every "Star Trek" fan deserving of the name is familiar with
the "odd-even" rule for the feature films.  The second, fourth, sixth and
eighth films in the series have been the most entertaining; the first,
third, fifth and seventh, not so much.  STAR TREK: INSURRECTION, the
latest biannual return of the "Next Generation" cast, marks the ninth
big-screen journey into the Trek universe, inspiring a combination of
trepidation and hope.  Could this finally be the adventure which would
break the odd-number jinx?
     Well, not exactly.  STAR TREK: INSURRECTION is an average story,
competently told, energized primarily by the chance to mingle once again
with the characters from the "Next Generation" television series.  The
premise finds the Enterprise called to assist when Data (Brent Spiner),
participating in a mission on another planet, apparently malfunctions.
Once in the system, Captain Picard (Patrick Stewart) and company discover
the voluntarily agrarian Ba'ku society about to be removed from the planet
by an alliance between a Federation admiral (Anthony Zerbe) and a race
called the Son'a, led by Ru'afo (F. Murray Abraham).  It seems that
radiation on the Ba'ku planet possesses a "fountain of youth" quality
which makes it incredibly valuable, particularly to the genetically
deteriorating Son'a.  Picard is outraged by the plan to forcefully
relocate the Ba'ku, however, and leads his crew to help defend the planet
against the Son'a's sinister plans.
     STAR TREK: INSURRECTION, like most of the films in the series, is
clearly designed to appeal to the Trek faithful first, and to a broader
audience second.  That's one of the qualities which makes INSURRECTION
feel as fragmented as it does.  Every cast member gets to bow to the crowd 
in a showcase sub-plot -- Data bonds with a Ba'ku boy over the mysteries
of childhood; Worf (Michael Dorn) re-experiences Klingon puberty as a
side-effect of the planet's radiation; Riker (Jonathan Frakes, who also
directed) gets frisky with Troi (Marina Sirtis) and shaves off his beard;
LaForge (LeVar Burton) has his natural eyesight regenerated and weeps at
the sight of a sunset.  During the run of the series, each cast member
could get a couple of episodes per season to anchor the main story line.
Over the course of a 100 minute film, trying to give seven characters
enough to do to keep them happy leads to plenty of punch lines but not
enough focus.
     It's particularly unfortunate that all the business for the other
crew members draws attention away from Patrick Stewart.  Here he gets a
romantic relationship with a Ba'ku woman (Donna Murphy), as well as a
chance to lecture on the historical tragedies of "ethnic cleansing."
Stewart has the presence to make virtually anything he does feel
commanding, but there's always a sense that he should have _more_ to do.
Just as he was always the best thing about the "Next Generation" series,
he's the bext thing about the "Next Generation" films, whether playing the
fool in a ceremonial headdress or radiating moral courage.  Stewart as
Picard is almost always going to be a good enough reason to watch a Trek
film, while watching him step back for the good of the ensemble will
always be a bit disappointing.
     There are other good reasons to see this particular film, including
some sharply-staged action sequences (Frakes showed a similar facility in
1996's FIRST CONTACT) and plenty of belly laughs.  There are also other 
reasons to be disappointed, including a wasted villain in F. Murray
Abraham and a resolution which you may miss if you blink.  Altogether it
feels a bit small for the big screen, more like a solid episode of the
series  (complete with obvious allegory) than a film.  Perhaps there
aren't that many great ideas for Trek features to go around, and maybe
that's why the heirs to Gene Roddenberry's vision manage to come up with a
really good one only once every four years.  If they decided not to make a
movie every two years, and waited until that really good idea was ready,
they could eliminate that "odd-even" problem once and for all.

Author
Brian Koller
The ninth in an apparently endless series of films
based upon the television series "Star Trek", this is
also the third film to use the "Next Generation"
cast.  "Insurrection" gives us the answer to the
question, what would happen if a one-hour show is
stretched to a two-hour film?  While the cinematography
is better and the budget is bigger, it seems that we
have been down this road before, and too many times.
Special effects, techno-babble, and makeup that looks
like uncomfortable rubber scarecrows take the place
of plot, dialogue and character development.
Midway through "Insurrection", there are attempts to
add some warmth to the formulaic sci-fi fantasy action
plot.  Fearless captain Picard (Patrick Stewart) gets
a platonic love interest with uninteresting Donna Murphy,
while the android Data (Brent Spiner) is taught how to
play by an uninteresting pre-adolescent.
Romance is rekindled between director/second banana Riker
(Jonathan Frakes) and consellor Troi (Marina Sirtis),
both of whom are unbearably smug as a result.
There's also some kind of moral about the evils of
technology, and that it is wrong to steal planets from
people.
Then, it is back to the fantasy action adventure, with
Picard and his heroic crew rescuing the gentle, peace-abiding
villagers from the ugly mutants attempting to dislocate
them.  The plot is reconciled in wholly predictable fashion,
with nothing being done to prevent Star Trek X from appearing
in theatres two years hence.
Since the formula has run aground, I have a suggestion
for Frakes and Rick Berman.  Why not make "Star Trek X"
a musical?  Picard can perform "MacArthur Park".  Frakes can
sing "You're So Vain".  LaForge would sing "I Can See Clearly
Now".  Data will perform "Hooked on a Feeling".  Troi can
warble "Torn Between Two Lovers" while Whorf tackles "In the
Year 2525".  Sure, Trekkie fans would feel alien-ated,
but perhaps it would be a cult film classic, like
"Rocky Horror Picture Show".
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Author
Arnold Kim
Title:  Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
Okay, I admit it.  I do like to watch Star Trek on occasion, and might even 
consider myself a slight fan of the series.  I've seen 7 of the 9 movies, and 
many of the episodes of Next Gen., Deep Space 9, and Voyager.  A lot of the 
good and the bad aspects of the series in there, and the latest incarnation, 
"Star Trek: Insurrection" (1998) mixes both.  It has the premise and the ideas 
of the wonderful TV series, but with the execution of some of the worst 
films.  
"Star Trek: Insurrection"  once again brings us back to the familiar company 
of Captain Picard, Commander Riker, Lieutenant Data, Worf, and the rest of 
the "Next Generation" crew.  This time, we are reunited with them amidst 
a plot between corrupt Starfleet officials and an alien race called the Baku, 
who attempt to basically evict the peaceful, agrarian Sona people from their 
home planet, which is basically a giant fountain of youth.  This, of course, is 
in the interests of research, as discoveries about the planet can potentially 
help millions of people suffering from variosu illnesses or whatnot.  Of 
course, when Picard finds out about the intention to move these people, 
him and his crew revolt against the officials and their alien allies.  
Now here's the main problem with the film.  When I was watching it, I 
thought to myself, what was so bad about moving them- 600 people- if it 
were in the interests of millions of others?  On the other hand, it _is_ the 
eviction of 600 innocent people.  The story would have been made a lot 
better if  it addressed this moral dilemma- do you sacrifice the few for the 
greater good?  Rather, it answers this question way too quickly and then the 
story just turns into a fairly mindless "sci-fi flick", using film cliches like 
the child going back into a dangerous area to save his pet.    And in order to 
try to make up for the lack of plot, it attempts for a "twist" towards the end 
revealing something about the relationship between the Sona and the 
Baku, but that twist feels contrived.  
Similarly, I think the characters and their relationships seem to suffer as a 
result of the disappearance of strong plot as well.  I liked the way things 
were going with the characters in the beginning, articularly the rekindling 
of the relationship between Counselor Troi (Mariana Sirtis) and 
Commander Riker (Jonathan Frakes, who also directed).  The moments 
they shared were snappy, smart, and with some welcome sexual energy.  
But those moments, of course, are gone later in the film.  Captain Picard 
also starts up a romance of his own with a young-looking Sona woman 
(actually a few centuries in age) and I think that the chemistry between 
them can be pleasant and beautiful, just like the woman herself is, but 
again, that suffers as the romance tries and fails to integrate into the latter 
half of the film with the phaser blasts going in every direction.  
Many believe that today, good special effects are taking the places of a good 
story, and that pretty much seems to be the case with "Insurrection".  The 
visual effects are probably the most remarkable element of this film, and are 
a step above those that are offered in the other Trek films.  Some shots, 
particularly involving the Enterprise itself, are  obviously computer 
generated, while others, like when we see more of Lt. Data's body as he 
strips off the "invisible" clothing that he wore, are pretty eye-opening.  My 
personal favorite is the shot of the invisible Holodeck revealed after water 
had been sprayed on it.  
However, none of this makes up for what I think are the foundations of a 
good film- characters and plot, both of which 2/3 of the film is lacking.  The 
ideas behind this film had pretty good potential; it's disappointing to see 
them with relatively half-baked execution.  My score out of 10: 4.5
They said they tried to make it more like the TV series, but I guess not 
enough.  

Author
Tim Voon
Starring: Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar Burton,
Michael Dorn, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis, F. Murray Abraham.
Screenplay: Michael Piller.
Director: Jonathan Frakes.
There are those of you who will whinge about the fact that INSURRECTION,
is just as ordinary as another episode of the successful STTNG
franchise. There will be unfair comparisons made to the previous, likely
to be more successful, well made, FIRST CONTACT. All of the above may be
true, but this is still an enjoyable movie to watch. Then there are
those who will complain about the lack of action or special effects. My
reply would be, if you want to see special effects visit George Lucas,
if you want something more thoughtful and evenly paced, watch STTNG. It
is true that the tension is not as great as in FIRST CONTACT, but hey,
you can't have a Borg in every movie, and the lack of cliff hanger
action is well compensated by light humour and character developments.
The dependable cast is a joy to watch although visibly older -
especially Counsellor Troi, but appearances are secondary - it's the
characters we've come to watch. This movie is a team effort, with an
almost even focus on each member of the original cast, unlike FIRST
CONTACT, which belonged to Picard. Despite much criticism from others,
this is still a fine movie in the vein of what we have come to love and
enjoy about the hearty crew of the USS ENTERPRISE.

Author
David Sunga
Written by: Rich Berman and Michael Piller
Starring: Patrick Stewart, Donna Murphy, Brent Spiner, Jonathan Frakes,
Michael Dorn, LeVar Burton, Marina Sirtis, Gates McFadden, F. Murray
Abraham
Ingredients: Forced displacement of ethnic minorities, idealistic
starship captain
Synopsis: 
An idyllic planet has rings around it that emit mysterious metaphasic
radiation, creating an anti-aging effect similar to that of the fabled
Fountain of Youth. In order to covet this valuable resource for
themselves, the greedy United Federation of Planets and their ally the
mysterious Ru'afo of the Son'a race (F. Murray Abraham) try to forcibly
relocate the planet's inhabitants: 600 peaceful Ba'ku villagers, who
have renounced technology and don't wish to be relocated. 
Captain Picard (Patrick Stewart) and the crew of the Federation starship
USS Enterprise decide that forced relocation of minorities is an immoral
violation of the Prime Directive (the law preventing the Federation from
interfering with the development of other societies). They side with the
villagers and lead an insurrection against Ru'afo's forces.
In the subplot, Picard falls in love with Anij, a Ba'ku woman who is
over 300 years old. 
Opinion:
In 1962 racism in America was so rampant that George Wallace won his
governorship supporting the separation of Whites from non-Whites. Only
about three years later came Gene Rodenberry's space adventure series
Star Trek - - a disguised method for 1960s people to examine their own
attitudes towards war, racism and international cooperation.
Roddenberry's Star Trek was not so much about the future as it was about
current issues and moral dilemmas. Advocating a more multicultural
society, it helped shape America.
Like its 1960s predecessor, STAR TREK: INSURRECTION has a strong moral
tint to it: questioning whether the greater good of the majority (the
Federation) outweighs the needs of the minority (the Ba'ku). This
agonizing question, which has plagued humanity for centuries, is decided
in about 5 minutes by the Enterprise crew. Then they have a short,
bloodless war, where a child must predictably run back to look for his
beloved lost pet despite an avalanche of falling rocks. And in the
aftermath, the heroes ride off into the sunset without regard to how
future conflicts over the metaphasic resource might occur or be
prevented; or how their use of technology has affected the villagers
whose culture has vowed to renounce technology; or the politics of
disobeying Federation military orders. 
STAR TREK: INSURRECTION clocks in at about an hour and 43 minutes.
Somewhat escapist, the film leaves the juicy, formidable questions
unanswered. But it is still plenty enjoyable in the way that TV episodes
are: nice, neat, and sanitized. After an intriguing beginning, there is
no shortage of action in the second half to keep Trekkies and
non-Trekkies satisfied.
Copyright Š 1998 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
Homer Yen
Something odd has happened to Commander Data (Brent Spiner). He was
apart of an observation team that was sent to secretly observe a
peaceful colony known as the Baku. But he exhibits insubordinate
behavior by making his presence known to the villagers (a severe
violation of a non-interference clause known to watchers of the series
as the Prime Directive) and also attacks his fellow officers. What has
caused Data to act this way?  Captain Picard (Patrick Stewart) and the
rest of the Enterprise crew, who have always entrusted their lives to
Data, comes to his aid and subsequently launch an investigation to
determine the motivation behind his actions. As a result, they uncover
a secret plot that could forever affect the lives of the Baku. And
although the Enterprise crew would be quick to defend the peaceful
colonists against mighty oppressors, their actions may jeopardize a
newfound alliance as well as their own future. It seems that an
incredible phenomenon makes this planet something of a Fountain of
Youth. Secrets learned from this planet may help humanity survive the
ongoing challenges from hostile alien factions of the Star Trek
universe. The wizened Picard, however, can not justify the forced
removal of a people. He must find a way to protect them. 
Unfortunately, Picard seemed like the only one that exhibited any kind
of convictions. His Shakespearean background allowed him to inject a
believable pathos into his role. The rest of the crew and even the
tone of the movie, however, seemed to lack any kind of fervor,
excitement or wit, which made the previous Star Trek movie (First
Contact) so enjoyable. Much can be blamed on the subject material,
which centers more on a moral battle rather than a life-or-death
struggle. The goal of Picard's crusade didn't seem all that
compelling, which made the whole movie experience somewhat
uninteresting.  One thing that I've always admired about many of the
Star Trek storylines is that it frequently presents a plot that has
some educational value - whether the episode is intended to impart a
lesson or whether it reflects on a significant chapter of humanity's
history. The drawback, however, is that the presentation can be
somewhat sobering, and in a 2-hour, feature-length film, the message
can wear thin rather quickly. So, as a fan of Star Trek, I enjoyed
seeing the crew reassemble for another mission. But I was disappointed
to a degree because this latest installment offered an all-to-familiar
premise that amounted to a slightly better-than-average episode.  


Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: December 11, 1998
Starring: Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar Burton,
Michael Dorn, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis, F. Murray Abraham, Anthony
Zerbe
Directed by: Jonathan Frakes
Distributed by: Paramount Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG (sci-fi action violence, mild language, sensuality) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/st-insur.htm
STAR TREK is inarguably the most successful entertainment franchise of
all time. The latest motion picture in the formidable line follows in a
tradition that is now thirty-three years old, and it is the ninth
feature in a string of sequels that extends back to 1979. It might be
thought that STAR TREK: INSURRECTION has a lot to live up to. 
That's not the case. Although there are certain conventions and customs
to pay homage to, it has long been a hallmark of the STAR TREK series
that each movie is nine-tenths self-contained. Certain features have
been major turning points for the series -- for example, in STAR TREK:
GENERATIONS, audiences saw the destruction of the Enterprise-D -- but
INSURRECTION is more modest in its intentions. This is, simply put,
bread-and-butter STAR TREK -- a double-length television episode with
beefed-up special effects and a bit more polished script -- all for the
enjoyment of the fans. 
INSURRECTION begins in the Sierra-Nevadas -- er -- a peaceful planet
inhabited by an idyllic race of metahumans. These people live a life
delightfully free of technology and have a youthful vigor about them;
but like all good things, it's not destined to last. As it turns out,
their planet holds certain "magical" properties which have attracted the
interest of the highest levels of Starfleet and its alien allies. When
Captain Picard (Patrick Stewart) and the crew of the Enterprise-E learns
of this, however, it's obvious that the Starfleet's intentions are a
clear violation of the Prime Directive (the Directive is Starfleet's
rule prohibiting interference with the natural course of a
civilization's progression). Hence, Picard and his top officers resign
from their commands and lead a mission of insurrection on behalf of the
planet's people. 
Even for non-fans, the movie is still some very impressive cinema. On
the technical side, INSURRECTION is the most awesome TREK feature to
date, giving the audience a good load of special effects. Of course,
TREK special effects have never been on-the-cheap, but the significantly
larger budget for a motion picture allows the computer folks to get a
bit more creative. On the aesthetic side, however, a lot of that
grandeur is lost. The script is not pervasive or moving -- Picard only
gets one great speech -- and instead fills its time with sniveling bad
guys or straight-faced humor for the Enterprise crew (most of which is
genuine). 
The acting corps is back in fine form, although these actors have been
playing the same characters for over ten years now. Stewart is
considered by many to be the most accomplished actor to have ever donned
a Starfleet uniform, and he makes a fair impression here. Jonathan
Frakes (directing himself again in his second TREK feature), as
Commander Riker, and Brent Spiner, as Lt. Cmdr. Data, are wonderful as
Picard's top two officers. Director Frakes even makes a point of giving
more screen time to the rest of the ensemble cast, whereas the previous
two features -- FIRST CONTACT and GENERATIONS had focused almost
exclusively on one character. 
Overall, INSURRECTION is not the best STAR TREK movie to date. It lacks
much of the inspiration that the previous two features had, opting
instead to take a lighthearted tone. Those not expecting greatness will
find this to be a real crowd-pleaser; but there will be disappointed
fans out there. Probably best seen on a Saturday afternoon with nothing
else to do.

Author
Steve Rhodes
Data, a.k.a. Lt. Cmdr. Data (Brent Spiner), goes haywire in the ninth
theatrical release of the STAR TREK saga, called STAR TREK:
INSURRECTION.  Flying solo in his spaceship, Data fires on his comrades
in the Federation.  Rejecting all orders to stand down, it takes the
singing of a Gilbert and Sullivan opera by his leader, Capt. Jean-Luc
Picard (Patrick Stewart), to trip him up.
Yes, it is time again to go back to one of science fiction's longest
running soap operas, STAR TREK.  Its fans will likely love this latest
episode.  Lesser devotees, like this reviewer, will probably be
entertained but slightly confused.  Although most of the movie is
relatively straightforward, some sections play like a foreign language
film without benefit of subtitles.
The story this time concerns the Ba'ku, a people who have "warp
capability" but who have rejected technology.  A pacifist race, they
live an agrarian life.  The story revolves around a sort of fountain of
youth that they've discovered and that others want to steal from them.
In a bad latex suit, F. Murray Abraham plays the nefarious Ru'afo, who
wants the Ba'ku's regenerative secret for himself and his people.  He'll
stop at nothing to get it, and Capt. Picard is willing to risk a
court-martial to thwart him.
The intelligent but talky script mixes in some nice doses of humor.
Data, in one of the funnier scenes, reveals that he was designed to
become a flotation device in the event of a water landing.  He then
proceeds to demonstrate this ability, providing a nice little sight gag.
Too often director Jonathan Frakes, who plays the part of Cmdr. William
T. Riker, has a sense of pacing that borders on the glacial.  Data, for
example, has a long dialog with a 12-year-old Ba'ku about the meaning of
childhood.  This is one of many soporific scenes that would have been
better eliminated or at least trimmed significantly.
Although the story has a nice twist toward the end that almost everyone
will appreciate, the movie seems designed to please STAR TREK fans while
not caring much about the casual viewers.  Taken as a whole the movie is
fun even if it does contain several long, dull passages.
STAR TREK: INSURRECTION runs 1:43.  It is rated PG for sci-fi violence
and sexuality and would be fine for kids around 9 and up.
My son Jeffrey, age 9, said that he could not compare this one to other
STAR TREK movies since this was his first one, but he really liked it
and gave it ***.  His favorite parts were the action sequences,
especially those using the phasers and the other guns.  He said that the
movie was frequently confusing about exactly who were the good guys and
who were the bad and what each was up to.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Michael Redman
Ever-expanding civilizations run into a problem eventually. The Roman Empire
had its external enemies, but internal problems are what finally defeated the
massive state. The government had fallen into a state of disrepair, the
infrastructure couldn't stand the weight and it all collapsed into itself. The
"barbarians" at the gate were merely finishing off what had already been accomplished.
Some critics of modern western civilization compare it to Rome just before its
downfall. They say that it's too complex and the center cannot hold. We'll see.
In the far-flung future of "Star Trek", the United Federation Of Planets,
spanning hundreds of planets, could be slowly falling apart. The Borg and
Dominion are pressuring it from without. More importantly, the Federation High
Council seems willing to abandon its most sacred rule for a shot of rejuvenation.
As the third Next Generation "Star Trek" film opens, an investigatory team of
Federation and their new allies the Son'a are spying on a peaceful Ba'ku
village. Android Data (Brent Spiner), on loan from the Enterprise, goes
berserk for some reason, attacking his teammates and exposing them to the Ba'ku.
Admiral Dougherty (Anthony Zerbe) is determined to destroy Data, but Captain
Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart) demands a few hours to rectify the
situation. When he arrives at the planet, he discovers that the android is the
least of the problem. In apparent violation of the Prime Directive, the
Federation is attempting to secretly re-locate the Ba'ku because their world
is the fountain of youth.
As anyone with any Trek knowledge would know, Picard decides that the civilian
population is being wronged. Casting aside direct orders from a superior
officer, he and the rest of the Enterprise officers beam down to save the innocents.
"Star Trek" has a remarkably long history in terms of popular culture. The
television program debuted 32 years ago and has spawned several sequel series
and nine films as well as nurturing a substantial subculture of Trekkies and
Trekkers. This movie, as well as previous ones, is for them and they'll love it.
The "Next Generation" series has been off the air for a while and the films
are the only opportunity to watch new adventures of Picard, Data, William
Riker (Jonathan Frakes who also directs), Geordi La Forge (LeVar Burton), Worf
(Michael Dorn), Deanna Troi (Marina Sirtis) and Dr. Beverly Crusher (Gates McFadden).
For the rest of the audience, the film is a mixed experience. It is a
well-done new episode in the future history of the Enterprise crew, but it
isn't anything spectacular. 
Showing the new "Star Wars" preview before the film might be a mistake. After
the breathtaking scenes from what will surely be next year's blockbuster,
"Insurrection" pales by comparison. Trek has a history of an odd style of
storytelling. There are very few moments of high drama. Most of the scenes
take place in small rooms. There's a whole lot of talking and rarely a sense
of danger.
The big battle on the planet's surface involves the Federation and Son'a
tracking down the fleeing Ba'ku and shooting them -- with little darts. When
they are hit, they are teleported up to the orbiting ship. It doesn't come
across as real combat, but more like a futuristic game of paintball. Get shot
and you're out of the game.
The space battles aren't much better. Most of the action is offscreen. Word
has it that some of the effects didn't work and scenes were cut. When Riker
uses a video game joystick to steer the ship, it laughable not exciting.
Even the sinister Ru'afo (F. Murray Abraham), leader of the Son'a, is
underdone. Abraham is capable of a fine performance, but we don't get much
here. Ru'afo will not rank in the list of great "Star Trek" villains.
"Star Trek" also has a long-standing tradition of recycling old stories and
ideas. It's obvious when the camera pans over the Ba'ku village and shows 
them to be beautiful people living in harmony with their environment, that
they're soon to be in big trouble. The Son'a are hideous, confirming the
problems with too many facelifts. Guess who are the aggressors.
Disobeying the Federation to do the right thing is so common that we don't
even see Picard agonizing over his decision. I kept awaiting the
"insurrection" in the title but it's nothing that we haven't seen before.
Heavy handed allegories are also a Trek convention. The Ba'ku being relocated
for their natural resources is a reference to any number of historical events
especially the plight of Native Americans.
Picard's romance with the Ba'ku Anji (Donna Murphy) follows his trend of
falling for strong women but never following up. Murphy is a nice touch in
that she's a sensual intelligent woman who's not a Hollywood 19-year old
drop-dead beauty. Riker and Troi renew their romance and end up in a bubble
bath drinking champagne although in the chaste world of "Star Trek", you
suspect that they're wearing swim suits under the suds.
Some of the humor works. Commenting on their rejuvenation, Troi asks Dr.
Crusher "Do you feel your boobs starting to firm up?" Data's follow-up is
hilarious. And some of it doesn't work. Data singing a tune from "H.M.S.
Pinafore" is just goofy.
Although the theme of the Federation's aging is never explored, it does leave
possibilities for future films that go a bit deeper. "Insurrection" is
enjoyable for the Trek fan and not too bad for the general audience. Maybe one
day we'll see that marvelous "Star Trek" film we've been waiting for.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and has been a Trek
fan for even longer -- although he's discovered that "Babylon 5" leaves it in
the dust. Trekkies can send hate mail to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 12/17/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com.]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
Paul-Michael Agapow
Star Trek the Decaffeinated Generation are ask to clear a planet of 
its peace-nik native inhabitants, get self-righteous and engage in a 
few ludicrous fight scenes.  Fin.
Delayed that it is, and futile a task that it is (how many people's 
minds am I going to change on the subject of "Star Trek"?), a review 
of the latest Trek cinematic offering is in order.  But more than 
review the film, I'd like to think out loud about Trek, science 
fiction and the cinema.  And although it will be interpreted 
otherwise, this is not a Trekkie-bash.  (Or Trekker-bash.)
For those who came in late: it seems like the Federation have 
discovered a source of Plotdevicium on a distant planet, which acts as 
a fountain-of-youth.  Recovery of the Plotdevicium requires the help 
of the Son'a, a race of aliens whose names sound like cough medicines.
Naturally the Son'a insist on doing it the "Viking and coastal village 
way" (remember: ugly aliens are evil aliens), meaning the native Baku 
must be evacuated.  Data goes haywire (again) and blows the cover of 
the undercover observers on the planet surface.  (Later he is talked 
down by Picard singing Gilbert and Sullivan songs.  Don't ask.)  As 
the natives now have tumbled to the Federation's plan, there's nothing 
for it but for Picard to romance the immortal native with the highest 
"schwing!"  factor.  (And if you wanted to know, immortals look like 
30-something white Californians.  To contrast them with the ugly 
aliens, they have names like modular Swedish furniture.)  Thus 
politicized and empowered, the Enterprise crew tells the Federation 
where they can stick their Plotdevicium and goes rogue to protect the 
natives and fight the evil and ugly Son'a.
That's not exactly a promising start, but this need not matter if it 
leads to some decent action or drama.  This happens to some degree.  
(There is a few nice jokes about Worf going through Klingon puberty.)  
Unfortunately there are some terribly cringeworthy moments in between, 
many involving the Federation's most dangerous piece of technology, 
the android Data.  (Proof that getting a plausible skintone and eye 
colour for robots is too hard for even the top scientists of the 23rd 
century.)  Data gets to deadpan lines like "lock and load" and be 
taught the value of play by a child.  (Remember those agonizing scenes 
in "Terminator 2" where John Connor pals around with the T1?  This is 
much worse.)  Picard's romance is lukewarm at best, so his concern for 
his lust-mate and her fate seems forced.  Indeed there's something 
oddly virginal and coy about the relationships in the movie.  Even 
when Troi and Riker romp naked in a bubble-bath, you can't believe 
that they'll ever actually have sex.  (Or that we have left the 1980s 
far behind.)  It's relentlessly PG. A similar comment can be made 
about the violence within the film.  The scowling Son'a villain 
(played by F Murray Abraham) seems more petulant than malevolent.
Having said that, I have to give full credit to the scriptwriters for 
something that we should see more of but don't: a cast of mature 
women.  A movie where you can have three significant female characters 
(Troi, Crusher, Anja), clearly not in their 20s anymore and not 
pretending to be, who are accomplished, active and sexually attractive 
is a rare thing.  I wish this wasn't something so rare, but kudos to 
the filmmakers anyway.
Going back to the character of Riker , it seems Frakes is unable to 
direct himself as an actor.  At least this is my interpretation of the 
terrible mugging performance that he delivers when he appears as 
Riker.  Looking more and more like a teddy-bear on steroids everyday, 
it becomes hard to believe that the Enterprise crew stands between the 
natives and genocide when Riker is grinning from ear to ear.  Given 
the light tone that pervades the whole picture, someone else should 
direct the next film, preferably one of the creators on the meatier 
old Trek films.
Don't misunderstand me - "Insurrection" isn't a bad film.  Genial 
perhaps, not predictable but unsurprising, maybe lightweight.  Even 
given the more ridiculous moments as listed above, about the worst you 
could say is to wish you'd waited for video.  It is certainly not near 
the worst of the Trek series.  (Number 5 has that category stitched 
up.)  But as you watch the film, the fairyfloss texture lets your mind 
wander to other subjects.
Is "Trek" science fiction?  Is it even speculative fiction?  Barely, 
by the evidence of this film.  Characters sprout long strings of 
gobbledygook in order to get themselves in and out of situations.  
(Pick 4 words from the following list and shuffle them together: 
reverse, phase, flux, radiation, energy, particle, resonance.)  It 
isn't so much that their words are meaningless but that they are just 
a way to create and solve dramatic situations.  This would not be so 
bad - it's just a story - except that the point has long been passed 
where there was any sort of consistency.  At least two items from 
"Insurrection" (immortality and defeating force shields by "matching 
resonances") should change the shape of the Trek universe forever.  
Want to bet they don't?  In Trek, the more things change, the more 
they stay the same.
Indeed, Trek has stopped trying to explain itself at all.  What if you 
had never seen any Star Trek.  Could you make head or tail of 
"Insurrection"?  What if you had just seen Trek Classic?  Would that 
help?  To a large extent, Trek has become strange people doing 
unexplained things in implausible ways for unapparent reasons.  It 
pitches itself solely at the (admittedly huge) fan market, those who 
know.  (And for whom the series is familiar people doing the same 
things in any convenient way for the usual reasons.)  The very 
definition of a movie franchise, it has become a commodity.  Every two 
years, the market shall be given 90 minutes of film.  File next to 
bread and milk.
Is this a problem?  If the Trek faithful are kept happy, what's the 
issue?  Perhaps nothing.  But I sense an opportunity wasted here, a 
chance for big screen SF, a chance for spectacle, a chance for Patrick 
Stewart to do some fine acting.  As in a franchise there's a weakened 
drive for quality and novelty, this opportunity will probably go 
wanting.  In 20 years time, Trek will be just like the James Bond 
series, pushing out more of the same, never being very bad but never 
being very good either.
Hmm.  For such a lightweight film, I've been (unintentionally) left 
with a lot of thought.  [**/ok] and a mild cheese on the Sid and Nancy 
scale.
"Star Trek: Insurrection"
Released 1998.
Directed by Jonathan Frakes.  
Starring Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar
   Burton, Michael Dorn, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis, F. Murray
   Abraham, Donna  Murphy.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (p.agapow@ic.ac.uk), Biology, Imperial College
"We were too young, we lived too fast and had too much technology ..."

Author
Walter Frith
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Association'
http://ofcs.org/ofcs/
Anyone who knows the 'Star Trek' movie series knows that they are all
characteristically different in style as well as substance.  The even
numbered ones, 2, 4, 6, and 8 are said to be better than the odd
numbered films 1, 3, 5, and 7, but each film in its own different way
has been mystical, action packed, compelling, funny, religious,
intriguing, harmonic, and terrifying.  Notice that there are 8
adjectives described here.  One for each film in order since 'Star Trek:
The Motion Picture' in 1979.  Wow!  Talk about a movie critic who
doesn't ramble on!  What better way to describe these films than in one
word.
The adjective that best describes 'Star Trek: Insurrection' is
"romantic".  The film is a nice 180 degree turn from 'Star Trek: First
Contact', the best of the three films so far that incorporates the cast
from television's 'Star Trek: The Next Generation' (1987-1994).
Captain Picard (Patrick Stewart) and his crew help a race of people who
are about to be sent into exile from their peaceful planet of prosperity
by others of the same race who want to take revenge for being sent into
exile years before.  The plot is quite monstrous.  Led by Ru'afo
(F.Murray Abraham), the exodus will come without the citizens knowing
it.  You see, in the 24th century it is possible to create a hologram
which is a fake image of something that seems real.  The entire planet
was to become a hologram and the unwitting citizens would be whisked off
the planet living in this hologram without even knowing it is false.
Riker (Jonathan Frakes), Data (Brent Spiner), LaForge (LeVar Burton),
Crusher (Gates McFadden) Troi (Marina Sirtis), and Worf (Michael Dorn)
tag along with Picard in heroic fashion to help save the people of the
planet and fight against the Federation at the same time who make a
disastrous decision early in the film.
The good thing about this movie is that all of the film's characters
seem to be displayed in an even flow of presentation and none of them
are given too much or too little screen time.  I thoroughly enjoyed this
film for taking the necessary steps and keeping in the tradition of
being very different from the other eight 'Star Trek' films.
Jonathan Frakes does a good job directing the picture while keeping the
pace free flowing and the running time relatively short.  Some of the
dialogue is wooden and a few of the performances a bit lazy but overall
I recommend this installment in the series simply for its ability to
entertain, tell a good but nevertheless predictable story and establish
its own identity.  When you consider that so many films that get
released are copies or variations of other films, it's really a surprise
to see a NINTH installment in a film series come off looking so much
different than its other chapters.
F. Murray Abraham (remember him).  He won a Best Actor Oscar in 1984 for
'Amadeus' for playing Mozart's rival Antonio Salieri.  His work as the
villain in this film isn't exactly the way I wanted to see him make a
comeback in film but he does his job well and creates probably the best
'Star Trek' villain since Christopher Plummer's portrayal of the evil
General Chang in 'Star TrekVI: The Undiscovered Country' in 1991.
Take advantage of this film on the big screen if you value the 'Star
Trek' series and while talk of this being the last 'Star Trek' film has
made its way through the movie grape vine in recent days, its box office
numbers suggest otherwise.  It remains a profitable and successful
franchise and the term 'Star Trek', when entered into any search engine
on the Internet, probably brings up more matches than any other genre of
its kind.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Jonathan Frakes.
Cast: Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Levar Burton, Brent Spiner, 
Michael Dorn, Donna Murphy, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis, F. Murray 
Abraham, Anthony Zerbe.
1998 - 103 minutes.
Rated PG (for mild violence).
Reviewed December 13, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews ">Http://members.aol.com/filmfan16/index.html>
I have never been a "Star Trek" fan, and, to tell the truth, out of the 
five films in the series that I have seen (1,2,3,8,9), I have disliked 
all of them. I do, however, always go into one of these with an open 
mind, and the ninth film in the series, "Star Trek: Insurrection," is no 
exception.
Dropping almost completely the hard-core sci-fi element of the previous 
one in the series, "First Contact," "Insurrection," tells the story of a 
planet that holds only 600 people, known as the Ba'ku, as well as the 
Fountain of Youth. At the start of the picture, the villagers go under 
attack by a second alien species, known as the Son'a, who want to push 
all of the Ba'ku out so that their own race will not die out. Also 
attacking the Ba'ku is Data (Brent Spiner), a robot from the Star Trek 
Enterprise. After returning to Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart) and the 
gang on their space ship, no one can understand why Data was somehow 
taken over by another force. So several of the Star Trek members travel 
down to the planet of the Ba'ku, where Picard meets up and starts to 
fall in love with one of the inhabitants, a sultry, kind alien woman 
(Donna Murphy), who is over six-hundred-years-old, but looks to only be 
in her thirties.
"Star Trek: Insurrection," is a completely unoriginal and cheap-looking 
installment in the series, and is a big step down from, 1996's "First 
Contact," which at least appeared to try to make something a bit 
different. In, "Insurrection," however, it plays like a low-rent episode 
of the television show, due to the small-scale, generic storyline, and 
an emphasis on one-liners rather than excitement. The film was filled 
with nearly non-stop comedy, and worse yet, most of it fell flatter than 
a cartoon character that drops off a cliff. Meanwhile, when there were
 action sequences, they were not at all interesting or inventive, 
relying on that old reliable ticking timer that counts down very, very 
slowly. This plot device, which is seen in just about every action film 
made nowadays, is getting old fast. Are filmmakers so bankrupt of 
ingenuity and ideas that they must always have a timer ticking away 
during the climax?
Another element of, "Star Trek," films in general is that Picard seems 
to always have to have a love interest, but then she always miraculously 
disappears when the next film is made two or three years later. Although 
Donna Murphy, who falls victim to this thankless love interest role 
here, is actually one of the few characters that we get to know in the 
103-minute running time, Alfre Woodard was far superior in, "First 
Contact." She should have returned for this one, but I don't blame her 
for not wanting to waste her time with this movie's disappointing and 
often lifeless screenplay, by Michael Piller.
"Star Trek: Insurrection," is perhaps the weakest film in the "Star 
Trek," series, although I have not seen what is widely considered the 
worst, "Star Trek V: The Final Frontier." "Insurrection," is the type of 
"safe" sequel that will bewilder non-fans, since it is so low-tech 
compared to most of today's blockbuster action films (although most of 
these are honestly not very good, either), and should disappoint the 
loyal Trekkies, since it could have easily been better if the makers had 
realized that the screenplay needed to go through a few more drafts. On 
second thought, they probably should have completely thrown the script 
out. That way, they could have come up with a story that at least had a 
sign of intelligence and freshness. 

Author
MikeJ1

>From http://www.ChainReactionBicycles.com/movies.htm
Please note this review is from a general movie section on our website (and
yes, it *is* a bicycle shop's website, not exactly where you'd expect to
find a movie review section!).  It's intentionally casual.  --Mike--
STAR TREK: INSURRECTION.  The 9th movie in the series (really!), the
3rd with the Next Generation cast, and the first in a very long time
where it doesn't even seem like the characters are acting, but rather
playing, or almost being the roles as they played them best in the
series. A great amount of playful banter amongst the cast does, in
fact, give you that "warm and fuzzy" feeling that some reviews have
talked about.  The villains...well, no, they really aren't all that
scary, they're just a bunch of mean & nasty ordinary people, and, in
the best tradition of the Next Generation series, you could even say
they're misunderstood. Only now, instead of Counselor Troi getting to
the bottom of their feelings, it's the wise old sage Picard coming to
the rescue...the thinking-man's captain.
 This movie could have been a simple two-dimensional story about good
and evil, but an intriguing plot twist may cause you to ask some
important questions at the very end of the film.  Are the Bake truly
blameless victims in what has transpired? Perhaps this is my only real
disappointment with the film as they spring such a major development
far too late in the film to play it out in the way it deserves...just
a bit too tidy an ending to a story that's akin in some ways to a
Shakespearean tragedy.
 I would say this is finally a Star Trek movie that can hold its own
against the work of the original series cast in Star Trek IV, The
Voyage Home (otherwise known as Save The Whales).  Let's hope that
it's not followed by something as bad as Star Trek V (Kirk meets God
and surprisingly it's not his reflection in a mirror).
 One final thing that just came to mind, and it's surprisingly
negative. In contrasting this movie with the TV series, I suddenly
came to an interesting realization.  Unlike the wasn't anything that
was, as they say, "Larger than life" that required big-screen
treatment.  This could have just as easily been an excellent two-part
TV episode, with the only thing really setting it apart was the
obvious comfort and almost ad-lib quality of the acting. In fact, the
scenes that depended upon actors outside of the regular cast were
those that fell flat!  In contrast, the exceptional two-part Borg
cliffhanger/season opener from the TV series (titled "The Best of Both
Worlds") transcended the small screen and would have been worthy of
all that 70mm film and huge budgets have to offer.
 But overall this movie is great fun and anyone familiar with the Next
Generation cast is going to have a great time...it would be virtually
impossible for a fan of the series to be disappointed.  As for those
not real Star Trek (The Next Generation) believers...more later.  We
attended the movie with at least two such people, Steve (who runs our
Los Altos operation and just happens to be my brother besides) and his
10-year-old son Eddie.  I know Eddie definitely enjoyed it...there's
enough action to keep things interesting (the usual phasers,
explosions, space battles etc.).  My almost-11 daughter Becky
definitely enjoyed it, but she's a confirmed Trekkie!

Author
Christian Pyle
Of the nine Star Trek films, "Insurrection" most closely approximates the style
of the television series.  It begins, as many TV episodes did, with a
surprising turn of events that intrigues the viewer.  Working with an invisible
survey team, Lt. Cmdr. Data (Brent Spiner) suddenly reveals his presence to the
planet's inhabitants and takes hostages.  Of course, his pals on the Enterprise
rush to investigate.  They discover that the planet's inhabitants-the
Ba'ku-possess immortal youth thanks to the "metaphasic radiation" provided by
the planet's rings and that a Federation admiral (Anthony Zerbe) is plotting
with a dying race-the Son'a-to relocate the Ba'ku and steal the radiation.
The inevitable clash between the admiral and Capt. Picard (Patrick Stewart)
concerns the Federation's Prime Directive, the rule of non-interference with
other cultures.  The Directive was invented back in the original 1960's TV
series as a band-aid for Star Trek's dirty little secret, its roots in
imperialist mythology.  All that boldly-go-where-no-one-has-gone-before,
basic-human-quest-to-explore stuff is the old cover story for European
campaigns to conquer, colonize, and exploit everyone else in the world.  The
Prime Directive reassures viewers that the Federation has higher, selfless
ideals.
Occasionally, Star Trek explores its roots.  In one of the last episodes of the
"Next Generation" series, for example, the Federation ordered Picard to
relocate a tribe of Native Americans because of a treaty the Federation made
with the Cardassians.  "Insurrection" is in the same mold, but seems
artificial:  the Ba'ku are peaceloving and kind; the Son'a are twisted and
selfish.  If the two groups were not so clearly a dichotomy of good and evil,
the movie would be more engaging.
"Insurrection" is the best of the "Next Generation" series thus far, and best
captures the intelligence of the TV series.  However, there are problems with
bringing this crew from the small screen to the large.  The major one is that
the movie is crowded.  While the "classic crew" had a subset (Kirk, Spock, and
McCoy) that, convention dictated, would receive most of the attention, the six
characters serving under Picard all have fan followings and seem to require
equal screen time.  Characters have to be developed on the fly, and little time
is left to introduce each of them to a new audience.
Michael Piller's script is peppered with jokes, probably in an attempt to give
this film the appeal that "Star Trek IV: The Voyage Home" (1986) had.  The
humor that comes out of the personality of the characters works well-for
example, Data, an android long obsessed with understanding the human
experience, befriends a child and learns to play-but other gags are just
embarrassing.  

Author
Brian Takeshita
Beginning on September 8, 1966, the original "Star Trek" TV series ran for
three years on NBC, and only survived that long due to a massive fan-based
letter writing campaign mounted after announcement of it's impending
cancellation by network executives in it's second year.  However, moved to a
time slot regarded as death by ratings standards, the show failed to be
profitable enough to be included in the 1969 fall lineup, and lived on only
in syndicated reruns.  In contrast, the TV series "Star Trek:  The Next
Generation" ran for seven seasons from 1987 through 1994 without any network
association (it was syndicated from the start), and showed no signs of any
waning popularity.  Whereas most television programs which last more than a
couple of years die agonizing deaths as viewers slowly tune out, "The Next
Generation" voluntarily took itself off the air in order to make the
transition to the big screen.  Passing the TV Trek torch on to two new
series, "The Next Generation" cast bowed out gracefully.  Whether or not
their transition to theaters has been entirely successful is another story.
The beginning of this film finds a malfunctioning android Lt. Commander Data
(Brent Spiner) exposing an operation conducted jointly by the Federation
Starfleet and a race of beings known as the Son'a.  The operation is to
study the Ba'ku inhabitants of a planet which seemingly possesses the
ability to grant immortality to those who live there, and exploit the
planet's unique resources for the good of billions.  The planet is in
Federation space, but the Son'a have the technology to make the exercise
work, resulting in a mutually beneficial alliance.  However, when the covert
nature of the operation is blown and captain of the Starship Enterprise
Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart) arrives to take Data into custody, he
interacts with the peaceful Ba'ku and slowly begins to uncover the real
agenda of the Son'a, and their ties to a goal which goes against the very
foundation of Starfleet:  The Prime Directive of non-interference with
less-developed civilizations.  Captain Picard must then lead his crew
against the orders of Starfleet Command and the Federation Council in order
to save the Ba'ku from potential destruction.
STAR TREK:  INSURRECTION marks the third big-screen outing of the heirs to
the top tier of active "Trek."  The first film, GENERATIONS, was heavily
anticipated, but marginally received.  The second, FIRST CONTACT, was widely
regarded as the shot in the arm that the flagging franchise badly needed.
With very little originality and a retention of the TV series mentality,
INSURRECTION seems unfortunately content to ride on the popularity of its
predecessor.
The first question that occurred to me was, "Why is the film called
'INSURRECTION?'"  It sounds so ominous and negative.  If the heroes of the
film are the ones fighting against the corrupt authority, it's not really an
insurrection, but more like a rebellion or crusade or something that sounds
a little more noble.  "INSURRECTION" would have been more apt if the film
were about how the Enterprise were sent to put down a mutinous band of
Federation citizens or something like that (then, in typical Star Trek
fashion, it would be later revealed that there was reason for the uprising,
exposing tainted elements of authority).  One of the working titles for this
third Next Generation installment was STAR TREK:  PRIME DIRECTIVE.  Would've
been a heck of a lot better, if you ask me.
Jonathan Frakes, who also directed STAR TREK:  FIRST CONTACT, and who also
plays the role of the Enterprise's first officer, Commander William Riker,
shows a solid directorial talent once again, but the principal problem with
this film is that the story plays like something from one of the series
episodes, but has been dragged out for two hours.  A tighter screenplay
could have the whole film in a one-hour installment, but a great deal of
useless filler is added in order to stretch the story into feature length.
Watch for one of the Ba'ku women's ability to seemingly slow time, then be
prepared to be let down as neither this ability, nor its significance, is
explained.  Worse yet, some of the filler poses elements intriguing to fans,
but are left untended and unresolved by the end of the movie, almost as if
we'll be able to see a continuation next week.  However, there won't be a
next week; we'll probably have to wait another two years, and it'll be
interesting to see if they remember to even give lip service to some of
these things.
There's a lot of stuff in INSURRECTION that's being passed on to us as new,
but which has really already been covered during seven years of episodes.  I
suppose if you haven't watched much of "Star Trek:  The Next Generation", it
may not matter, but the movies are essentially made for the fans, and those
are exactly the ones who will be disappointed in this film's lack of
originality.  For example, one of the filler subplots involves Data
interacting with a child and discovering childhood for himself.  He must
have done it a half dozen times during the series.  Isn't his search for
humanity getting a little old?  What happened to the computer chip which
gave him emotions?  It was included in both the previous movies, but in this
one, the Enterprise's Chief Engineer Geordi LaForge (LeVar Burton) claims
Data "didn't take it with him" to the planet.  It would seem as though it
this was done just so screenwriters Rick Berman and Michael Piller (both of
whom had extensive involvement in producing "The Next Generation") could
recycle a theme which has already been explored repeatedly.  There's also a
trick that Picard pulls on the leader of the Son'a (F. Murray Abraham) that
seems so incredibly clever until you realize that Picard had the same trick
pulled on him years ago, then subsequently used it himself, and all done
years before this movie.  Did the filmmakers think we've got really short
memories, or that we'd nod knowingly at the "homage" to the series?
The current incarnation of the Starship Enterprise (NCC-1701E) still hasn't
grown on me.  Perhaps it's because the new ship was thrown to us in such a
nonchalant manner in the last film, greatly contrasted with the extensive
(although admittedly a bit excessive) showcasing of the Enterprise in STAR
TREK:  THE MOTION PICTURE, and I still feel that we haven't yet been
properly introduced.  The "Enterprise-E", as it's called, looks alien, and
although I realize there are probably a lot of aliens in Starfleet's design
bureau, the classic look of the Enterprise has been a reassurance that we,
the humans of the here and now, are the forefathers of those who would
explore space in the future.  As the very symbol of the whole "Star Trek"
franchise becomes further altered into something unrecognizable, we as the
fans become distanced from "Star Trek" and from the hope that was engendered
in those who so faithfully followed it.
Before you go wondering if there was anything I liked about STAR TREK:
INSURRECTION, I will say there were some very positive aspects to the movie.
The film's pacing is pretty good, with enough action interlaced with the
dramatic and lighter moments to keep things moving.  Special effects, while
widely downplayed as a contribution to the "greatness" of a film, are superb
and deserve note for their technical contribution.  As a side note, this is
only the second "Star Trek" film out of nine to not use Industrial Light and
Magic for any of its special effects.
The actors play their roles with the aplomb of old pros, once more slipping
into their familiar personae.  Additionally, they actually look as if
they're having fun, and that really goes a long way.  It was also nice to
see that Captain Picard has a love interest (Donna Murphy), since he so
rarely got one in the past.  How Patrick Stewart must envy William Shatner.
Unfortunately, the talents of F. Murray Abraham are woefully underused in a
role which requires little of the skilled actor.  The character itself is
not even very good as a villain, and no where near some of its deliciously
over-the-top predecessors.  And you know how they say the villain often
makes the picture.
There has been a rule of thumb used by both critics and fans of the Star
Trek movies:  The even numbered ones are good, the odd numbered ones not as
good.  STAR TREK:  INSURRECTION is number nine in the series.  The rule
lives on....

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar Burton, Michael 
Dorn, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis, F. Murray Abraham, Donna Murphy, 
Anthony Zerbe, Lorella Cuccarini, Mark Deakins, Breon Gorman, Max 
Grodénchik, Gregg Henry, Stephanie Niznik, Michael Welch, D. Elliot Woods.
 Written by Michael Piller and Rick Berman. Directed by Jonathan Frakes. 
103 minutes.
Rated PG, 3 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to 
pbbp24a@prodigy.com
To put this review in its proper context, I should acknowledge right up 
front that I'm a "Star Trek: The Next Generation" fan. Yes, I've reached 
that point in life where I can publicly admit that I am in touch with my 
inner geek. Like many who enjoyed "ST:TNG," I was irritated when 
Paramount elected to fold the still-thriving show so that the vigorous 
cast could replace the geezers from the original series and keep the 
company's lucrative "Trek" movie franchise alive. Thanks to the corporate 
money-grubbers, instead of 24 varied episodes a season, we now only get 
new doses of the Enterprise crew every two or three years, usually in 
trumped-up "thrill-ride" movies that bury the characters under a barrage 
of action scenes. 
Thankfully, "Star Trek: Insurrection" is the exception to the rule. While 
the ninth entry in the franchise has plenty of battles to appease the 
testosterone junkies, "Insurrection" places the emphasis more on people 
than explosions. The quirkiest "Trek" yet, "Insurrection" is breezy, low-
key and often humorous. It plays less like an "event" movie and more like 
a juicy two-part episode of the series. 
This time around, the crew faces off against corrupt Federation officials 
allied with some nasty aliens bent on removing a group of settlers from a 
planet that is a virtual fountain of youth. When the Enterprise crew 
discover the true agenda of the Son'a, age-obsessed beings who get more 
face-lifts than Michael Jackson, Captain Picard and company remove the 
pips from their uniforms and become freedom fighters, protecting the 
idyllic Ba'ku colony from Starfleet and the alien invaders. 
Along the way, most of the cast gets a chance to live it up. In 
particular, Patrick Stewart lets his hair down (so to speak) with an 
exceptionally robust portrayal of Jean-Luc Picard. As opposed to the last 
two films, which placed the Captain in a variety of grim situations, this 
"Trek" highlights the swashbuckling aspects of the character. Picard even 
gets a little planet-side romance with Anji (Donna Murphy), a Ba'ku woman 
who bears a striking resemblance to Susan Oliver, the actress who 
romanced Captain Pike in the pilot episode of the original "Star Trek" 
series. 
The Ba'ku planet emits particles that retard the aging process and the 
Enterprise crew quickly feels the effects of the phenomenon. Blind 
engineer Geordi LaForge (Levar Burton) finds his eyes regenerated and 
finally gets to witness a sunrise without using high-tech visors or 
ocular implants to "see." After wearing a car fender over his brow for 
seven seasons and machine-like contact lenses for two films, what a 
relief it must have been for Burton to have his eyes clear of appliances.
The planet affects the libido as well, stirring up the long-dormant 
romance between Will Riker (Jonathan Frakes) and Deanna Troi (Marina 
Sirtis), who share a bubble-bath in one playful scene. Doctor Beverly 
Crusher (Gates McFadden) shows more zest than usual, while Worf (Michael 
Dorn) suffers the indignities of Klingon puberty, dealing simultaneously 
with an increase in his already aggressive nature and a Texas-sized zit 
on the side of his nose. 
Only the android Data (Brent Spiner), who leaves his emotion chip on the 
Enterprise, is unaffected by all the hyper-hormonal activities. He spends 
most of the film tending to business, while a Ba'ku kid tries to teach 
him how to play. After the last two Data-centric films, it was nice to 
see his character in a supportive role, allowing the others a bit more 
time in the spotlight. 
"Insurrection's" mix of humor and heroics is the most successful since 
"Star Trek IV: The Voyage Home." Two early gags, one showing Worf taking 
a bump on the noggin and the other involving several characters singing a 
Gilbert and Sullivan tune, triggered memories of cringe-inducing scenes 
from "Star Trek V: The Final Frontier," the worst "Trek" movie ever, but 
director Jonathan Frakes handles most of the jokes with style. 
The film has its weak moments. Compared to previous "Trek" villains, 
Son'a leader Ru'afo (F. Murray Abraham) is a real featherweight. For an 
exotic race of immortals, the Ba'ku look an awful lot like a bunch of 
lily-white suburbanites preparing for a camp-out. And why, oh why, do the 
producers feel the need to include a leaden catch-phrase in every film? 
When Brent Spiner is forced to say "Saddle up, lock and load," you can 
sense the embarrassment behind his expressionless face.   
But enough complaining. The light and lively "Star Trek: Insurrection" 
deserves credit for daring to break from the standard "Trek" formula. 
While some fans will grouse about the film, I found this change of pace 
most welcome. Instead of witnessing yet another struggle to save the 
universe, it's refreshing to see the Enterprise crew have a little fun 
for a change. 

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     Maybe STAR TREK is growing up and what we are seeing with STAR
TREK: INSURRECTION is really a good thing.  For once the Next
Generation crew are not out trying to save the universe from a mad man
trying to destroy it.  The basic issue being discussed is one that gets
seen in American courtrooms every year.  The issue is one of eminent
domain. Does the Federation have the right to relocate a group of six
hundred colonists from a planet and turn that planet into a boon to the
entire human race?  Do the colonists have a right to say they do not
want to give up their planet at the expense of the greater number of
people?  It is an important legal point.  Certainly there are examples
in the past when relocating people has been a great injustice.  What is
at stake are the principles of the Federation.  But do we really care,
given that we are living in a decade when many large institutions seem
to be betraying their founding principles?  The idea that the
Federation of Planets may be no better than many of our own government
agencies is hardly shocking today.
     This principle of possession is an odd basis for what is in large
part an action film.  It certainly is a complex moral issue.  Or it
could have been a complex moral issue if the writers had the courage to
leave it ambiguous.  But not surprisingly they did not have that
courage.  Rest assured that when the movie is over--and in fact from
very early in the film--the viewer will know who the good guys are and
who the bad guys are.  And what is more--I doubt that this is a
spoiler--it is the pretty people who will be the good guys and the ugly
people who will be the bad guys.  So if the themes are a little more
sophisticated than usual, the approach is not.
     The Ba'ku are an advanced race who have abandoned their advanced
technology and returned to a simple life in which they can do simple,
pleasant, creative tasks all day long.  They have found themselves a
planetary Shangri-La that keeps them forever young.  It is the kind of
non-technological utopia where everybody has nice creative tasks like
baking bread or making pottery and nobody within range of the camera
has to do laundry, scrub mildew stains, or clean toilets.  But another
race, the Son'a, are plotting to get control of the Ba'ku's planet so
that the Federation can analyze the magic of the planet.  The Son'a
people look like they were inspired by the Katherine Helmond character
of BRAZIL.  They look like they started human looking but have had too
many facelifts so the flesh is pulled too tightly over their skulls.
It is a kind of nightmare that people must have in affluent
neighborhood of Los Angeles.  There is also something of The Shadow in
them as they and the Federation were able to build a large observation
station within yards of the Ba'ku encampment, all the while clouding
Ba'ku minds so they were never detected.
     The Enterprise crew get involved on the side of the Ba'ku,
defending their right to monopolize the positive effects of their
planet.  Curiously this film almost directly contradicts the theme of
STAR TREK II: THE WRATH OF KHAN in which Spock tells us that the needs
of the many outweigh the needs of the few.
     The actors playing crew of the Enterprise do their standard
competent acting job.  It may take a little while to get up to speed
remembering the personalities of each of the characters as one viewer
told me.  But they step through their roles with performances that are
equally without flaw or excitement.  Even the former great Patrick
Stewart is a competent but pedestrian starship captain. Rejoining the
crew is Michael Dorn as Worf who manages to be assigned to the
Enterprise or to Deep Space Nine, whichever this agent prefers at the
moment.  F. Murray Abraham is the alpha Son'a, but even he cannot put
much passion into his role.  The actors are much upstaged by the usual
exquisite Enterprise effects.  Views of the old starship tacking in and
out of nebulae where this film shows its real artistry.
     The STAR TREK: INSURRECTION might make a decent episode or two of
the TV-series, but it has hardly the makings of a classic film.  It
just is not sufficiently involving.  I give it a 5 on the 0 to 10 scale
and a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Author
David Wilcock
Starring Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner and F. Murray
Abraham.
Directed By Jonathan Frakes
Running Time: 1 hour 40 minutes.
The new Star Trek movie has a lot to live up to: it is an odd numbered Star
Trek film. (The ninth to be exact.) It must therefore try to escape the
dreaded 'odd numbered Star Trek film curse,' which is that every odd
numbered Star Trek film is rubbish. (Remember number five? Ouch!)
Thankfully, while not brilliant, it is certainly not a mess by any means.
The rather silly plot centres around a planet with magical properties that
Captain Picard (Stewart) wants to protect from an alien race, led by
Abraham.
The film manages to cram in action, laughs and romance in even amounts.
Although it could be a little more light hearted (like the wonderful Star
Trek IV) the film is entertaining. The plot is alright, but there's a nice
twist in the film when it threatens to drop dead. The lines, though, are
sometimes banal, especially the ones by the inhabitants of the planet.
There's the usual philosophising and grand speeches that come part of the
Star Trek package, but there's nothing to cringe worthy in this film.
There's not as much action in the film until the very end, so the film has
to rely on the characters. They're played with the usual gusto by the Next
Generation cast, and the actors are also given the opportunity to act a
little younger. (The planet enables people to remain young.) There are some
gratuitous love scenes involving a beardless Riker (Frakes) and Troi (Marina
Sirtis), which are even more gratuitous when you consider Frakes directed
the movie. But there's some standout scenes: when LaForge (LeVar Burton)
sees a sunset with real eyes for the first time, and anything involving the
Klingon Worf (Michael Dorn) returning to puberty is also amusing. The
increasing popularity of Data (Spiner) is evident in this movie, as nearly
the entire film centres around him.
Sadly, the film is missing a enemy as menacing as the Borg in the previous
First Contact (1996.) The alien race in this film are somewhat menacing, but
Abraham isn't a strong enough presence to warrant as a 'good' bad guy.
Therefore, the Enterprise is lacking a definite evil to fight against.
Still, the bad guys look good, and they're suitable enough to keep the plot
going.
The special effects are nice, and the Enterprise is looking as fine as ever
(if a bit small.) The effects are done entirely on computer, so some parts
look like the Wing Commander game. Still, they are generally exciting, and
are used well in the action sequences. Talking about action, when it finally
arises, it's well handled, and is a break away from the heavy-handed plot
that is taken far too seriously.
Star Trek: Insurrection is fine for trekkies, and good for non-trekkers as
well. I'm not a Star Trek fan, but I enjoyed this film. It's nothing
special, and Star Wars: Episode 1 will probably whoop it's ass (sorry) but
it's good, solid entertainment. Worth watching.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Author
Nicole Lesley
Starring: Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar Burton,
Michael Dorn, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis.
With any Star Trek movie, there comes a lot of baggage. Lots of people
stay away because they're not trekkies: they've never watched the
television show and they don't like Science Fiction. On the other
hand, fans expect so much, even becoming a tad proprietal about their
show. So who should go to see the latest instalment of the Next
Generation films? How does it hold up for the two extreme ends of the
viewing population?
I fear trekkies will be a bit disappointed. Just like First Contact,
the previous Star Trek movie, Insurrection doesn't have a lot of
plot. It's basically an extended television episode on a bigger
screen. All the standard characters are there, doing what you'd expect
of them, and it's an interesting enough plot but it's not a ground
breaking movie.
On top of that, the effects are pretty cheesy. When I go to a Star
Trek movie, I basically expect an extended television episode with
cool special effects: I got the former but was robbed of the
latter. The ships, docking and moving about in space looked like
models. Even worse were the less amazing scenes like when
Data (Brent Spiner), Picard (Patrick Stewart) and the love interest
were entering the water-craft they had discovered: the mountain
backdrop was clearly fake. I don't know how much money was spent on
special effects for Insurrection, but when I compare it to the great
crash scene from the first Next Generation movie, it comes up very
short.
There are, however, many pluses for Insurrection. While there will
never be any Best Actor Oscars being awarded to the cast of a Star
Trek film, all the performances are quite good. On top of that, there
is a lot of humour in this movie. Whilst there were humorous pieces in
First Contact, it had a very dark tone. There is no such tone in
Insurrection: we have goodies and baddies, people to save, lessons to
be learned but it is all done with a light-handedness that is very
funny. The ability of the cast to laugh at themselves makes the film
quite enjoyable.
The moral of the story, standard Star Trek, is also handled
well. Although it's fed to us via Picard pontificating about the
rights of people to self determination, watching Picard pontificate is
not an unpleasant thing. His mellifluous voice can make anything
palatable.
Overall, I think non-Science Fiction fans may enjoy Insurrection more
than the hard core fans. Like most Science Fiction, it's really a
morality play. In this case, however, Insurrection contains lots of
morality, heaps of play and very little Science Fiction.

Author
Susan Granger
Susan Granger's review of "STAR TREK: INSURRECTION" (Paramount Pictures)
Love springs eternal in this ninth film of the popular "Star
Trek" franchise, as Captain Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart) is
attracted to Anij, one of the leaders of an endangered planet and
First Officer William Riker (Jonathan Frakes) resumes his romance with
Counselor Deanna Troi (Marina Sirtis). True to the spirit of the
Starship Enterprise, whose purpose is to explore strange, new worlds
and, in doing so, learn about many different species, Captain Picard
and his crew come to the rescue of the Ba'ku, a small community of
humanoid people whose serene and peaceful way of life is threatened,
along with the Fountain of Youth properties of their planet's
atmosphere. And, as it has been so often, the Star Trek plot is a
metaphor for current events with Picard challenging a Starfleet
authority that he believes to be corrupt and becoming an intrepid
freedom fighter. Doing his best to overcome the weaknesses of the
script - a blustering but relatively ineffectual alien villain
(F. Murray Abraham), a leading lady who totally lacks screen charisma
(Broadway's two-time Tony winner, Donna Murphy), and an overdose of
techno-babble - director Jonathan Frakes keeps the pace light and
lively, breaking from the standard save-the-universe, thrill-ride
formula and emerging more as a robust, fun-filled reunion episode of
"Star Trek: Next Generation." To its credit, once again, the humanity
outweighs the hardware. On the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, "Star
Trek: Insurrection" is a breezy, lightweight 7, combining idealism,
action-adventure, and the requisite special effects with some of the
gentle humor and romance that characterized the original television
series.

Author
Luke Buckmaster
Cast: Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar Burton,
Michael Dorn, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis, F. Murray Abraham, Donna
Murphy, Anthony Zerbe
Director: Jonathan Frakes
Screenplay: Michael Piller based on a story by Michael Piller & Rick
Berman
Australian theatrical release: December 31, 1998
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 stars
Melbourne's population of Trekkers littered the press screening of
Insurrection for a very good reason: they love their Star Trek.  When a
nervous presenter mispronounced "Jean-Luc Picard," all hell broke loose.
"Go away," screamed one distressed fan. "Piss off!" said another.  The
situation worsened when the presenter read a plot synopsis, only to hear
"don't tell us!" "Boooo!"  This unruly mob spoke the language of all
Trekkers; they didn't care what happened, as long as they got to see the
Enterprise on the big screen as soon as possible.  And that's the way
it's been for years.
For a show that was never popular in its original series, Star Trek has
certainly evolved miraculously.  The first six films involved the
adventures of Captain Kirk and his crew of quirky characters, whereas
films seven to nine have featured the stalwart Picard (Patrick Stewart)
at the helm of the saga.  In Insurrection (the ninth in the series),
Stewart is given the opportunity to act yet again as the rogue hero,
which he does so convincingly.  But this time Stewart is not given as
large a spotlight as he had in 1996's First Contact, for the sake of
developing some of the other main characters.  Director Jonathon Frakes
(who also stars in the film) combines fun elements of character
personalities and action scenes nicely, whilst not exceeding himself in
entertainment or excitement.
Insurrection is similar in tone to Star Trek IV: The Voyage Home, in
that its characters are placed in environments that are very different
to the ones in which they are accustomed (and believe me, that gag's
milked for everything its got).  For one reason or another, Picard and
his crew come across a strange remote planet belonging to a peaceful
race of people named the Ba'ku's.  This planet possesses a unique
value - it is bathed in radiation that reverses the aging process. That
is why the Son'a's - an aged and dying race - want desperately to get
their hands on Ba'ku territory.   But Picard becomes determined not to
let any harm inflict the Ba'ku's after developing a romantic
relationship with a sprightly native woman (who is over three hundred
years old).  The Enterprise are forced to break Federation rules in
order to protect the Ba'ku, whilst the Son'a's will do anything to
further their existence.
The primary problem of Insurrection lies in its script.  The synopsis
above indicates a simplistic one-way storyboard, but Frakes adds so many
subplots that the film's main focus is often forgotten.  The potential
destruction of a civilization strangely seems less compelling than what
some of our heroes go through, ranging from android Data's (Brent
Spiner) attempts to discover what it feels like to be a child, to Worf's
(Michael Dorn) experience of Klingon puberty.  Most Star Trek films are
very good at underlining the central plot and striving to build a
rewarding climax, but Insurrection has too many distractions along the
way. When the climax does come, it is nowhere near as spectacular as it
should have been.
Special effects are something that Star Trek films can never get enough
of.  Those featured in Insurrection are certainly good, but hardly
represent what the industry is capable of.  Insurrection would have
benefited from whiz-bang, spectacular visuals (achieving the standard of
1998's Lost in Space would have been a good feat), because often the
film feels a little too ordinary and much like something we have seen
before.
Patrick Stewart delivers his usual solid performance as the film's
anchor, and is especially good when he raises his voice - coming across
as a wild and unpredictable authoritarian.  The rest of the cast are a
wacky lot, and everyone seems to be having a lot of fun playing out
their roles, which is the way it should be.  Like most Star Trek films,
the makeup and costume designs are terrific and breathe life into
characters that only Star Trek could think of.
I can understand why some Trekkers would be disappointed by
Insurrection. This is not a traditional Star Trek film in style and
pace; it is more like an extended episode of the series.  Every
character discovers something about themselves, whilst the narrative
slowly moves along with occasional scenes of tense confrontations and
tasteful action (Star Trek has always been careful not to disgust or
irritate viewers).  Frakes has created a solid and generally
entertaining piece, without making Insurrection one of the best films of
the series or even the summer.  The Trekkers get to see the Enterprise
again - and that's probably all that matters.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Alphalink Movies:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Author
Bob Bloom

 Star Trek: Insurrection (1998) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Patrick Stewart,
Donna Murphy, F. Murray Abraham, Brent Spiner. Directed by Jonathan Frakes
 Star Trek: Insurrection is an enjoyable movie, employing the basics that
should endear it to most Trekkers. It lacks the weight of some of its
predecessors, especially Star Trek: First Contact, but that's not
necessarily a negative.
 Once in a while the Star Trek franchise offers a movie with a lighter
tone, such as in Star Trek IV: The Voyage Home. Insurrection, while in a
more serious vein, falls within that category in the Star Trek canon.
 This time, the crew of the Enterprise is out to defy a renegade Starfleet
admiral who is working with an alien race to take over a planet that has
all the properties of a fountain of youth.
 Basically, these bad aliens, the Son'a, who supposedly are Federation
members, are violating the Prime Directive, the code to which this
interstellar organization strictly adheres. It's kind of a non-interference
clause.
 Well, Capt. Jean-Luc Picard and his crew act to set things right, which,
of course, they do.
 The heart of this Star Trek venture is, as always, the interplay between
the principals. And Insurrection is no exception. Picard (Patrick Stewart)
remains the voice of authority and reason. Yet he is willing to act when
necessary.
 This film also shows Picard, the romantic, as he becomes infatuated with
Anij (Broadway star Donna Murphy), the leader of the Ba'ku.
 One of the complaints Trekkers had about Picard and the Next Generation
series was that this captain was too cerebral. He would rather talk his way
out of a situation, unlike classic Trek's Capt. Kirk, who was willing to
fire a phaser at the least provocation.
 But, as in First Contact, Picard demonstrates his military skills, though
not in the same overwrought, vengeful manner he brought to the previous
outing.
 Brent Spiner's Data provides, in a sense, the film's comic relief. This
android's childlike fascination with humanity is ably demonstrated when
Data befriends a young boy who teaches him about having fun.
 Both Spiner and Stewart also get the chance to demonstrate their vocal
talents with a bit of Gilbert & Sullivan. You know the producers - and cast
- are having fun when HMS Pinafore can be thrown into the mix without the
audience groaning.
  Also rekindled is the romance between Cmdr. William Riker (Jonathan
Frakes) and ship's counselor Deanna Troi (Marina Sirtis).
 Again, this all totals a more relaxed film, especially compared to the
previous outing against the evil dronelike Borg.
 Insurrection also features Oscar-winner F. Murray Abraham, buried under
much makeup, as the main villain, out to take over the Eden-like planet.
 The script is predictable, with one interesting surprise in the last act.
The special effects, most of which are computer generated, are very well
done, and Jerry Goldsmith contributes another fine score.
 Frakes, in his second stint behind the camera, shows his fine direction of
First Contact was no fluke. He keeps the action moving and ably mixes the
humor and adventure, creating a smooth-flowing audience pleaser.
 Insurrection is not a great movie, lacking the substance and depth of
First Contact as well as Star Trek VI: The Undiscovered Country.
 But it is a pleasurable excursion that should satisfy franchise fans, as
well as hold the interest of sci-fi fans in general.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
Ryker Phillips
     Star Trek: Insurrection was released to the general
populous on December 11 and opened to the tune of 22 million dollars.
Star Trek: Insurrection is a great story; especially since the
Federation are in the middle of a war with the Dominion.  In fact,
that is the only reason this movie floats over so well.
If you are not certain about this war, let me briefly tell you
about it as it has been portrayed on Deep Space 9.  Well, The
Dominion are a powerful governing force that came into existence
due to a race of shape-shifters that were tired of being persecuted
by solids.  The shape-shifters are the governing force.  Their
"senator" types are the Vorte, a race of clones that are impervious
to poison and lead the almost-indestructible Jem'hidar, which is
the foot soldiers of the Dominion. The Jem'Hidar are born
aggressive and addicted to a narcotic called Kitrocyl White.
The Cardassians, after getting booted out of the Bajoran
system cause of a treaty, losing their intelligent agency due to a
preemptive strike on the Dominion, and getting dogged by the
Klingons look to the Dominion and form an alliance to conquer the
Federation.  The war with the Dominion has been going on for about
a year and it looks kind-of like a desperate time for the
Federation.
Now onto the movie Star Trek: Insurrection.  The story floats
because the Federation makes an alliance with the SOna, which are
a race that are chiefly responsible for the production of Kitrocyl
White in the Alpha Quadrant.  Due to the closing of the wormhole to
the Gamma Quadrant, they are extremely important to the duration of
the Jem'hidar soldiers.  The Federation decide to force a
relocation on the Baccuu people who live on a planet that has
unique metaphasic radiation that rejuvenates humanoids to a younger
state of existence and holds them there for as long as they live in
that system.   As history has told us in the past, forced
relocations don';t work very well and lead to tragedy such as the
forced relocation of the Cherokee tribe and the subsequent Trail of
Tears episode.
Star Trek, in the past, has done a good job of taking a story
and making relate to things going on in the present time
situations.  For example, Star Trek VI: The Undiscovered Country
paralleled the breakdown of the Soviet Union in the early 90's.
Unlike this situation, I see no relevance to any current
situation therefore I do not see a point for this movie to exist.
It is a good story and there are quite a few clever and humorous
lines.  It brings up a lot of good points.  Maybe the intention is
more a reminder than anything else of what could happen.  All in
all, I give this a 3 1/2 out of 5.
For more Star Trek stuff and persnnal info visit my page at:
Http://devo.sfasu.edu/~ryker

"Has it ever occurred to you that the reason you believe the Founders
are gods is because that's what they want you to believe?  That they
built it into your genetic code?"
"Of course they did.  That's what gods DO."
Odo and Weyoun-6
Star Trek: Deep Space 9
Episode: Treachery, Faith and the Great River

Author
Jamahl Epsicokhan
First, a moment of silence for the passing of Gene Siskel, a man who, along
with Roger Ebert, helped bring film criticism to the mainstream of America...
--
Hey, it's only two months late. Hey, the movie is no longer even playing in
most areas. But I promised it; here it is.
Warning: Spoilers follow for TNG's latest feature film, "Star Trek:
Insurrection." If you--after all this time--still haven't seen the movie,
then proceed only at your own risk of spoilage.
Two years ago, "First Contact" set a very respectable new standard for the
Star Trek film franchise. It maintained the perfect balance of everything
Trek cinema should, in my view, have: action, humor, neat sci-fi technical
aspects, a story with imagination and wonder, and an overall sense of
insight regarding what Star Trek is about. At the same time, it was
approachable as good science fiction, so even a non-Trekker would probably
find it well worth the time.
"Insurrection," on the other hand, is more of a Hollywood comfort film.
Omnipresent in the movie is the sense that everyone involved was so intent
on having fun while making it that they could barely extend themselves far
enough to tell a story bearing any consequence.
Don't get me wrong; there's a lot that works in "Insurrection." But overall
I couldn't escape the feeling that I was watching actors who were trying
very hard to deliver lighthearted lines with the underlying attitude of,
"Oh, but this is all just fluff and fun--feel good about it!" than a
genuine attempt to say much new about their characters or the state of the
Federation or Star Trek universe.
The plot involves a science-fiction device that's older than science
fiction itself: A Search for the Fountain of Youth. The fountain might lie
within the planet of the Ba'ku, a peaceful non-technological people who, as
the movie opens, are being watched by Starfleet. Is it a prelude to first
contact, or something more insidious? Starfleet high-ups talk ominously.
The plot thickens: Suddenly, Data comes bursting onto the scene wearing a
suit that makes him invisible to the naked eye. (Pretty neat.) Having been
damaged, he's malfunctioning and out of control. He turns his phaser on the
hidden Starfleet watching post, making it visible to the nearby Ba'ku. The
issue involving the Ba'ku is forced when Picard is brought to the planet to
disable and retrieve Data, who is operating on "conscience" alone: Data
knows there's something morally wrong with the Starfleet plan for the
Ba'ku, but he has no mental process for addressing it. What's Starfleet's
unusual interest in this planet--located in a turbulent and unstable area
of space known as the "Briar Patch"--and what is the motivation behind the
Son'a, the race with which Starfleet has allied itself while investigating
this world?
Who are the Son'a? Well, for one, they scream "BAD GUYS" in capital
letters. They speak in gruff, stern voices and wear ominous-looking hoods.
(How does a hood look ominous? I dunno; it just does.) And they look as if
they've had skin grafts on their faces just a few hours ago--probably
because they have; on more than one occasion in the movie, we see them
receiving grafts while lying down under a device that literally stretches
their faces to make the new skin fit better.
Once the Enterprise arrives on the scene, Picard, along with Worf (whose
presence on the Enterprise is so contrived this time around that we aren't
even allowed to *hear* most of the throwaway lines explaining it), retrieve
Data in an action scene combining music, singing, special effects, and
goofy comedy in a somewhat unlikely yet effective way that sets the tone
for the film: light, funny, relatively inconsequential, fairly diverting.
With Data's memory restored, a quiet investigation of the Ba'ku village
leads Picard to uncover the planet's mystery. A Ba'ku woman named Anij
(Donna Murphy) gives Picard the brief tour and history of their people. As
it happens, the Ba'ku are not as technologically primitive as they appear;
they were warp-capable space travelers at one point, but a small subset of
their civilization abandoned the problems of technology in favor of a
simpler life in this village. Picard becomes more suspicious of the
situation when he and Data discover a cloaked ship resting in a lake not
far from the Ba'ku village. The ship is equipped with a massive holographic
grid, purpose unknown. Eventually, Anij levels with Picard: The Ba'ku do
not age on this planet. No one does.
It's not long before the brass have to come clean with Picard: Admiral
Dougherty (Anthony Zerbe), on orders from the Federation Council, has made
a deal with the Son'a to relocate the Ba'ku to another planet, using a
holographic simulation on the specially designed ship as a way of
transporting them without their knowledge and therefore, as what would be
the cause for objection, without their consent. The Federation wants to
study the world because of its properties that slow or halt aging, and
they've made a deal with the Son'a because only they have the technology
that will allow Starfleet to harvest any permanent scientific advances from
the planet's mysterious properties. Unfortunately, this will leave the
planet uninhabitable. Starfleet has looked at other alternatives, Dougherty
tells Picard, but this is the only option.
Picard calls the action an outright theft of a world. He will have nothing
to do with it and intends to argue the matter with the council. Problem is,
doing so would render the issue moot; by the time the council hears what he
has to say the Ba'ku will be relocated (which could potentially have
serious consequences to their survival) and the planet will be all but
destroyed.
The morality question is the film's most interesting element: At what point
do the ends justify the means? Is research of a phenomenon that could
literally be a fountain of youth benefiting billions of people worth
sacrificing one's principles? After all, Dougherty argues, it's only 600
people. But how many people, Picard responds, does it take before it
becomes wrong?
As interesting as the moral question is, the film doesn't develop it nearly
as far as it could've and should've. The film's titular "insurrection"
comes when Picard and crew decide to take up arms ("Lock and load," Data
says, obviously unaware he's been reprogrammed as a sound bite for
Paramount Studios) and defend the Ba'ku from being forcefully removed from
the planet. Being inside the Briar Patch, with complications arising from
the intervention of the Son'a and a host of other mitigating factors, the
Enterprise crew's actions comprise not so much an insurrection as a minor
resistance against an adversary that becomes completely severed from the
rest of the Federation's knowledge and control (though I must admit that
"Star Trek: Isolated Skirmish" probably wouldn't have been a very good
movie title). Picard isn't taking a stand against the Federation; he's
taking a stand against Dougherty, who's judgment and actions clearly become
suspect as the film progresses, thanks to the presence of Son'a leader
Ru'afo (F. Murray Abraham) who's personal interest in the matter is neither
selfless nor subtle.
Particularly since Ru'afo changes the master plan whenever he damn well
pleases--deciding to remove the Ba'ku from the planet by force once Picard
intervenes--the moral ambiguity dissipates rather quickly, turning the
conflict into an entertaining but routine example of the Enterprise crew
versus the bad guys. Admiral Dougherty just gets stuck on the wrong team.
That's a shame, because a real "insurrection" could've been very
interesting--something that might've actually challenged the moral compass
of the Federation. I liked the idea of Picard putting his career on the
line to defend these people, but if two-thirds into the film it becomes
clear that Picard's actions will ultimately be unquestionably heralded as
the Right Thing by the Federation Council, it seems a little too much like
the Easy Way Out. The risk to Picard's career isn't real because he was
never in any real danger of facing any consequences.
The "battle for paradise," as the taglines put it, works through a familiar
two-tiered plot structure. On one level is Picard's planet-bound defiance,
as he leads the Ba'ku from their village into the rocky area terrain where
they can hide from flying Son'a "tagging" devices, which tag people with
small transmitters that beam them into a Son'a ship's holding cell.
On the other level is Riker in command of the Enterprise, which is pursued
by Son'a ships, leading to the entertaining requisite battle sequences
involving technobabble and gas particles that ignite and explode, thanks to
the volatile properties of the Briar Patch. The space battles between the
Enterprise and the Son'a ships (which look really cool, by the way) are fun
in their cavalier sense, including a line where Riker actually says, "We
aren't running from these bastards anymore!" and then uses a *joystick* to
manually take control of the helm. Meanwhile, Geordi is ejecting the warp
core as a necessary defensive measure, and when the Son'a regroup for
another assault, Geordi gets the priceless opportunity to say, "We're fresh
out of warp cores!" I liked the departure from the TNG battle standard
(this turns back the clock to "Star Trek II" battle attitudes), although
the cavalier sense also supports my argument that the film panders to a
mass-market audience.
Of course, if you want mass-market pandering attitudes, you don't have to
look much further than the humor undercurrent. The tone of "Insurrection"
is very different from "First Contact" (and very different from its own
advertising campaign), and I have no problem whatsoever with that. Star
Trek has always been diverse in story theme and approach. The problem with
this approach, however, is that "Insurrection" has a tendency at times to
beat the audience over the head with the sentiment.
Natural humor is one thing; obligatory forays into humor are another.
"Insurrection" has both, but it seems there's more of the latter than the
former.
Example: "Have you noticed your boobs starting to firm up?" Beverly asks
Deanna in one scene, obviously amazed at the wonderful benefits of a
Fountain of Youth. Data overhears. Then he walks a few feet away and
repeats what he has overheard to an innocent bystander. Funny? Somewhat so,
if for the wrong reason--the I'm-surprised-they-stooped-to-such-silliness
reason. There's plenty of that sort of thing in "Insurrection." Worf is
detoured into the film mostly so he can be on the receiving end of jokes
involving pimples and the nature of Klingon puberty. (I suppose that's
better than Gates McFadden's character, though; for the third movie in a
row, Crusher is reduced to a cog in the wheel of the plot and given little
to do.)
I have nothing against Trek humor, but I enjoy it more when it comes
naturally. "Star Trek IV's" humor was somewhat understated, and grew
naturally from the characters as we knew them. "Insurrection," however,
goes on fairly large detours of circumstance to arrive at goofy situational
humor, and comes off as more forced as a result. But some of it is fun.
And concerning matters of romance ... it's something of a mixed bag, too.
The Riker/Troi thing is something that's obviously been in the character
histories for a long time, and I particularly liked the amusing issue
concerning Riker's beard. But this is the sort of thing that worked better
in television series format, where one could get an update every few weeks.
Coming in the third TNG film, it seems out of the blue, and I have to ask
if it's worth the time given how rarely we see the cast these days. It's
exactly the sort of thing that makes "Insurrection" more difficult for the
non-Trekker to understand; they aren't in on the joke. In film format, I'd
rather see a solid story than a bunch of detours into past elements left
unresolved.
Picard's gradual affections for Anij make more sense in story terms, and
the chemistry between Patrick Stewart and Donna Murphy is always right
there on the edge of being powerful ... yet it doesn't quite get there.
Anij has an ability to slow down time, and she shares this experience with
Picard, but in the flurry of the plot the romance almost feels like an
afterthought.
The other subplot involves Data's friendship with the young Ba'ku boy,
Artim (Michael Welch). Artim initially fears Data as an artificial being,
as he was raised without an understanding of technology, but a friendship
begins to develop, especially after the boy's father, Sojef (Daniel
Hugh-Kelly), is tagged and beamed away to the Son'a ship. This subplot is
amiable, but not very useful in terms of Data's quest for humanity. We've
been here, and done this, haven't we? There's also the whole issue of
Data's emotion chip, which now apparently can be removed on a whim. My
question to the producers of the TNG film series: Do you want Data to have
emotions or not? Whatever the case, it's a waste to simply have Data in a
state of non-growth. The dialog here between the android and the kid at
times seems to regress Data back to mid-run of the television series--at
the very least pre-"Generations." There are only so many opportunities for
Data these days; wasting him like this is a shame.
Overall, the guest cast is entertaining, but, again, thin. They certainly
cast these roles perfectly, and the guest actors did a great job with what
they were given. Unfortunately, they simply weren't supplied with much
substance.
Anthony Zerbe is perfect as Admiral Dougherty, a figure of bureaucracy that
finds himself on the wrong side, comes to his senses too late, and pays the
price for it. He gets the movie's best death scene when Ru'afo knocks him
around and then shoves him into one of the face-stretching machines and
face-stretches him to death. Fine and good, but there isn't much subtlety
or depth to Dougherty concerning his motives and actions. His about-face
once the situation runs out of control is nothing short of obvious, and the
second he went into a room alone to confront Ru'afo, I said to myself,
"Welp, he's gonna die."
As a villain, Ru'afo is essentially a thug. He isn't coolly bitter like
Malcolm McDowell in "Generations," and he isn't manipulative or mysterious
like the Borg Queen in "First Contact." He's an intimidating brute short on
patience and high on repressed rage, and he doesn't hesitate to throw an
admiral around a room when he gets ticked off.
It's almost as if a conscious decision were made in the pre-production
stage that Ru'afo would be a return to the scenery-chewing comic-book
villains like Khan or Kruge (which is not to slight Khan at all, because
his style and dialog as such was unforgettable). The problem is, Michael
Piller's script doesn't give Ru'afo much in terms of good dialog to flesh
out the character. Lines like "If Picard or any of his people interfere,
eliminate them" seem to emanate from the comic-book realm.
But even if Ru'afo is a one-note thug, he's a *good* one-note thug. F.
Murray Abraham, not surprisingly, brings a lot to a relatively underwritten
villain, with an explosive anger and a directness that sells the
intimidation well. Abraham has an urgency that transcends the part, making
Ru'afo teeter on the edge of obsession and bitter fury. When Abraham says
something like "eliminate them," it's still enjoyable on a sort of cheesy
theatrical level.
Ru'afo's motives aren't very nice. Perhaps that's an understatement. Turns
out the Son'a and Ba'ku are really the same race. The Son'a had long ago
been expelled from the planet following an attempt to revolt against the
Ba'ku's non-technological ideology. Now the Son'a want the planet back (so
they can harvest its life-rejuvenating properties), and Ru'afo will do
whatever it takes to get what he wants. The Federation's interest in the
Ba'ku planet had unwittingly found its way into the middle of a blood feud.
I did appreciate that there's subtlety to be found in Ru'afo's number two,
Gallatin (Gregg Henry). He was also part of the original revolt against the
Ba'ku, but it becomes clear that all the killings Ru'afo is about to commit
to take the planet back is something eating away at Gallatin's conscience.
With time ticking down, Picard clues in on this, and, in a scene of extreme
swiftness yet surprising urgency (a Patrick Stewart performance can bring
urgency to about any situation) Picard talks Gallatin into listening to his
conscience and doing the right thing.
This leads to a series of events that nearly defies synopsis, as Picard
somehow beams Ru'afo and his crew onto the holographic-illusion ship to
trick Ru'afo into thinking he is on board his own ship. Thus, when he
thinks he's activating the "metaphasic injector" (the device that will
harvest the fountain of youth and poison the planet), he is actually only
flipping a dummy switch, thereby buying Picard and his crew time to foil
the plan. Jonathan Frakes, who brought great clarity to "First Contact,"
does his best in directing this confusion, but it somewhat strains
credibility. It makes more sense than it probably should, but I still felt
the symptoms of several double-takes.
Ru'afo figures out what's going on and beams himself onto the injector to
manually start it, leading Picard to beam over to stop him in The Final
Showdown [TM].
Like most everything else in the movie, the special effects are
entertaining and move the story along. But they're not
breathtaking--certainly nothing that connects the visual with the visceral
like, say, the opening shot of "First Contact." The invisible suits
comprised a reasonably interesting action scene. And there's the "palm
pet," which was cute but hardly essential. Then there are plenty of flying
tag robots, which provide a series of watchable though not exactly riveting
action scenes. And the decent holographic deceptions. Oh, yes, and Anij's
ability to slow down time until we can see the wing flapping on a
hummingbird--one of few visual effects that exists for its emotional
content rather than spectacle.
But most of the big special effects are about blowing things up. Case in
point: this final showdown, which comes complete with a Movie Bomb, which
naturally comes equipped with a digital readout that counts down while
beeping, while Picard and Ru'afo shoot at each other inside the metaphasic
injector--a huge device with awesome-looking space sails on the outside and
plenty of open space (conducive for a shooting gallery) on the inside.
Original villain death scenes are hard to come by these days, but Ru'afo's
death is another one of those instances where we're supposed to cheer when
Picard is beamed out of the exploding injector at the Last Possible Moment,
while Ru'afo gets blowed up real good. This is Hollywood moviemaking all
the way, lacking imagination and instead going with the safe bet.
In a way, Ru'afo's explosive demise perfectly sums up my feelings of
"Insurrection." Did I enjoy watching him blow up? Sure. Was there much
thought or ironic insight required to come to the conclusion that Ru'afo
must be blown up? Not a chance. Did I want something more? Yep.
The movie is entertaining in a superficial way. I sort of liked
"Insurrection." But I also felt kind of disappointed afterward. Considering
TNG movies only happen once every two (or more, in the future) years, it
seems to me that more should be done with a film than to make it a
glorified episode where the ship glides in, solves the problem, and glides
out--end of story. What's lacking are the lingering questions. A fountain
of youth is something that would change the perception of the entire
Federation. Isn't that worth examining? Having one admiral (who dies) as
the sole Federation representative for eternal youth is simply not enough,
and watching the Enterprise fly away from what could be the Greatest
Discovery Ever seems a little simplistic.
The bottom line is simple: The film is a good diversion. But you might want
to be sure your brain is in the "off" position before, during, and after
viewing.
--
Upcoming: Assuming there will be another TNG feature, I'm of the opinion
they should wait more than two years for the next one. As much as I like a
Trek movie, I'd much rather see them as "event" movies, rather than getting
in the habit of releasing them so frequently that the receiving attitude is
one of "Another Trek movie ... *already*?"
-----
Copyright (c) 1999 by Jamahl Epsicokhan, all rights reserved. Unauthorized
reproduction or distribution of this article is prohibited.
Star Trek: Hypertext - http://www.epsico.com/st-hypertext
Jamahl Epsicokhan - jammer@epsico.com

Author
Alex Sandell
*This review was originally published at "The Juicy Cerebellum" and is
copyright 1998 Alex Sandell [All Rights Reserved].  To read the full review,
head to www.juicycerebellum.com*
If Merchant-Ivory produced a "Star Trek" film, this would be it. A man who
must have been about 7 feet tall sat in front of me at the theater, blocking
my view. At first, this infuriated me; by the end of the movie I felt like
thanking him. Watching his gigantic head bobbing up and down was the only
thing that managed to keep me awake.
"Insurrection" runs less than two hours but feels like it never ends. Whenever
Picard's new girlfriend Anij (Donna Murphy) magically puts the world in slow-
motion (don't ask), it feels like director Jonathan Frakes is applauding his
pacing of the film. It just plods along as though there is no need to actually
entertain the audience when you can just bore the hell out of them and still
bring in 30-million the first week.
There are a few redeeming scenes toward the end of the movie, but nothing you
haven't seen in the million sci-fi flicks that have went before it. There's
nothing new in the special-effect's department, either. The effects seem to
have been sacrificed to cover the lead actor's ever-growing salaries. The film
suffers from a dated look due to this. 1996's "Star Trek: First Contact" was
ahead of its time with the stunning visual effects it showed us. It is
unfortunate "Insurrection" took a step backward.
All in all, this film isn't worth your time. It is nothing more than one of
those "sucky" episodes you would turn off on TV. "Oh, no! They're playing that
'Insurrection' episode again! Is 'Jerry Springer' on?"
If you must see it, wait for video. Pass this one up at the theater and go
rent any of the even numbered sequels such as parts 2, 4, 6 or 8. When it
comes to the "Star Trek" series, odd just isn't better.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Author
Cheng-Jih Chen
This movie works on so many levels!  There are elements of that Kevin
Costner-meets-Lakota movie ("Star Trek 9: Dances with Llamas"), a whiff
of Pennsylvania Dutch chic ("Star Trek 9: Dances with Amish"), all
suffused with old-fashioned Vermont hippie-commune idealism (well, at
least before the sellout).  It's an amalgam of all these, but set in
northern California.  Yes, the crew of the Enterprise-E, after long
voyages of discovery and galactic adventure, has found a bunch of
technologically advanced people who enjoy living their immortal lives
as dirt farmers, and have been doing so for centuries.
Yup.  Don't let the warmly lit, Italian-rural-style dining fool you
(dining scenes themselves taken from the "American|Brit in Villa For
Summer" genre, therefore "Star Trek 9: A Starship With A View").  Those
poeple, while they have not yet evolved into pure energy, know all
about warp technology, positronic brains and quilt-making.
Unfortunately, they wrote down their nuclear-weapons technology on a
napkin and lost it, so when it came time to "kick Son'a ass", all they
have are sticks with rusty nails in them.  We'd otherwise have a much
shorter film, giving back to us ninety minutes of lives.  We could have
used those extra ninety minutes to contemplate the benefits of a
simpler, rustic life.  I suppose that in taking this opportunity for
contemplation away from us and instead subjecting us to this movie, the
filmmakers have betrayed their own vision of paradise.
I suppose I should explain why nuclear weapons would have been needed.
Bad guys, led by F. Murray Abraham (oh, how far he's fallen: I saw
"Amadeus" recently on DVD, and what a wonderful Salieri he was.  Now,
he's simply the pathetic New Face of Evil.) in cahoots with the
Federation, have decided to steal the secret of Amish immortality.
They come up with this wacky plan involving holodecks and a trail of
breadcrumbs to trick the Amish to their reservation.  The offer of
casino rights apparently wasn't contemplated.  Picard, through a series
of humorous accidents and chance encounters, discovers the wacky plan
and sets out to foil it.  He also gets laid in the process.  (Oh, we
now have proof that Picard was born bald (well, you know what I mean):
bathed in age-reversing metaphasic radiation, his scalp budges not an
inch).  Of course, the Enterprise crew is successful, the rustic
paradise is saved, and Disney acquires rights to build a theme park on
the other side of the planet, Bed-and-Breakfast Land.
The other amusing tidbits: you can fly the Enterprise with a pop-up
joystick on the bridge.  This ain't no fancy Thrustmaster-type
joystick.  It's one of the nasty ones that come with your computer if
you buy it at Bob's Bait and PC Shack, the ones that get your X-Wing
creamed by those TIE fighters on Mission 4.  Riker got to use the
joystick (and had the bubblebath scene with Troi) 'cause he's the
director.  I have the impression that Riker was as screwed as the
hypothetical X-Wing player (not me, I suck at those games), because the
"fire phasers" trigger wasn't working.  If it did, it would have saved
many more minutes of movie.
There are actually lines of dialog that invoke Gilbert and Sullivan in
what would ordinarily be a tense, bad special effects-laden situation.
There are other lines of dialog that refer to breast size.  Boggle.
If I were the actors on Deep Space 9 or Voyager, I'd be pissed at the
whole movie-making apparatus over at Paramount.  To think, the studio
bigwigs may flush the franchise down the crapper before they get their
turn at making movies.

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:   Jonathan Frakes
Cast:  Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar Burton,
Michael Dorn, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis, F. Murray Abraham
Screenplay:  Rick Berman, Michael Piller
Producers:  Rick Berman
Runtime:   
US Distribution: Paramount
Rated PG:  action violence, mild language
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
One can not observe a Star Trek movie and expect to see serious science
fiction. The purpose of Star Trek is to provide flashy, innocent fun.
Sometimes the stories are compelling. Sometimes they're not. But, with
the exception of the first film in the series (which provides little
more than endless shots of amazed faces), I've never been bored by any
of the Enterprise's numerous missions. 
Star Trek: Insurrection is no exception. The film has gotten some
negative reviews (a friend of mine actually thinks it's the worst in the
series), but I'm not really sure why. It's an exciting, often hilarious
movie that engaged me and left me ready for the next Star Trek film.
Some say it's a bit too light, and more of a long episode than a film.
Others say the special effects are cheesy and that it's boring. I simply
enjoyed the film.
Insurrection, which is the second film to feature strictly the Next
Generation cast, introduces us to a race of people called the Ba'ku; the
Ba'ku are very old (most of them are about three hundred years old), but
they actually appear younger with age due to strange radiation in the
rings of their planet. Of course, these peaceful people can't horde this
fountain of youth all for themselves  leave it up to their archenemies,
the Son'a, led by Ru'afo (F. Murray Abraham), to mess everything up.
The Son'a, who are horribly disfigured and rely on daily reconstructive
surgery to be aesthetically acceptable, strike a deal with the
Federation to move the Ba'ku elsewhere and exploit the secret to keep
their race from dying. That's when Captain Picard (Patrick Stewart)
steps in: he realizes that moving the Ba'ku would kill them (it also
helps that he falls in love with a Ba'ku woman (Donna Murphy)). So, with
his trusty crew, Picard defies the federation to keep the Ba'ku in their
natural habitat.
When dealing with a series with as much history as this, it's not
entirely necessary to re-introduce your characters with each episode.
This is why I believe non-fans have a hard time getting into Star Trek;
in order to enjoy it, one has to understand how to approach it.
Insurrection, however, does a surprisingly good job of us new aspects of
the characters. Stewart is bold as always, a magnetic screen presence
and perfectly capable of holding an entire film together. Jonathan
Frakes, who also directed, is funny as Commander Riker; a subplot with
Data (Brent Spiner) discovering his lost childhood is fairly
interesting; and Abraham makes a perfect Star Trek villain, overacting
like crazy.
Frakes showed similar aptitude for direction in First Contact;
Insurrection is an exciting film, with some really attractive special
effects and a lot of good action. This is apparently the first Star Trek
film to utilize computer animation, and the result is very pleasing to
the eye: particularly in the climactic scenes, in which the Son'a employ
a giant space ship to suck up the rings of the Ba'ku planet, the special
effects have a clean, impressively sharp look. 
If I have any complaint about the film, it's that it tries to take a
moral stance when it's not very appropriate to do so. I don't think it's
that big of a deal that the Federation wanted to move 600 Ba'ku in order
to save the lives of thousands. Better yet, why couldn't they have
co-existed? Insurrection feels a little to light to spring these kinds
of big moral questions on the audience. With it's inherent camp factor,
the Star Trek series doesn't seem well-equipped to deal with issues like
this. I prefer to just enjoy the spectacle.

Author
Matt Williams
The odd-numbered Star Trek film curse strikes again.  For those of you
unfamiliar with Star Trek lore, it has been maintained that the only
good Star Trek films are those with even numbers.  Perhaps in response
to this, Paramount stopped numbering their Star Trek films after #6. The
latest outing of the Star Trek franchise, Star Trek: Insurrection, is
the ninth film in the series...and like many of its odd-numbered
brethren, it proves to be an awkward misstep.
Once again, it is the Star Trek: The Next Generation crew which takes
center stage.  This time, they're embroiled in a plot that feels like a
leftover tv episode.  The peaceful Ba'ku people are in trouble, but they
don't know it.  Their idyllic paradise planet is being lusted after by
the evil Son'a race, who crave its fountain-of-youth properties.
Certainly the Federation wouldn't allow this warlike race to totally
eliminate another society, would they? Well, therein lies the problem,
the evil Son'a are allies with the Federation, and the Federation is
willingly assisting the Son'a in their efforts.
Enter Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart) and crew.  Brought in to disable
malfunctioning android Data (Brent Spiner), the crew learn of the plot,
and quickly take sides against their own beloved Federation in order to
save the 600 Ba'ku people.
The dialogue of Star Trek: Insurrection is easily the worst quality yet
seen in a Star Trek film.  Virtually every other line is either a quip
or a catchphrase.  The rest of the script is meaningless technobabble.
There are several good acting talents among the cast, and they all
deserve better than this.
The special effects are above average, though most of them are pointless
effects for effects sake.  The starship combat scenes are visually
impressive, but confusing and lacking urgency.  Apparently more time was
spent determining what would look cool, rather than worrying about
things such as pacing, or even common sense.
There's precious little, if any, character development here.  In fact,
several of the characters have seemingly regressed from the events of
the last several movies (for example, Data's emotion chip is nary to be
seen).  There are a few romantic subplots:  Riker (Jonathan Frakes) and
Troi (Marina Sirtis) rekindle a relationship, and Picard gets together
with Anij (Donna Murphy), a Ba'ku woman.
The villains are also rather bland.  The most interesting thing about
the Son'a is their obsession with obtaining eternal life through
technology (rather than the Ba'ku's "natural" methods).  However, their
leader, Ru'afo (F. Murray Abraham) is all bark and little bite.
Star Trek: Insurrection isn't painful to sit through, but it adds
nothing to the Star Trek mythos, and overall is a complete waste of
time.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Author
Sheelba
There are rumors bouncing off the walls of Hollywood that this, the ninth
installment of the Star Trek Legacy, is the last we will see.  If this is
the case then I think this is an appropriate ending to a long series of
movies.
Plot Overview
Captain Picard (Patrick Steward) and the crew of the Enterprise are faced
with a delima, allow a Federation/Son'a alliance to remove the peaceful
Bak'u people from their planet and re-locate them to another planet without
any re-juvination abilities or defy orders and protect the Bak'u from
relocation.  Picard and crew (naturally) decide to go against orders and
defend the Bak'u.
As the show develops Picard falls in love with the Bak'u woman Anij (Donna
Murphy).
Rick Berman and Michael Piller did a great job of crafting a fun, funny, and
light-hearted action movie.  I found myself laughing at almost all of the
jokes in the movie, especially an exchange between Doctor Crusher (Gates
McFadden) and Deanna Troi (Marina Sirtis) when Troi was commenting on how
the radiation of the planet was making her "boobs" firm up.
The plot-line of Bak'u v.s. Son'a was well crafted with an unexpected twist.
I also liked the way the show gave us a glimpse of a darker side in the
Federation.   Dispite the strong points in the main plot there were a few
weaknesses, like the way Berman and Piller decided to leave Data's emotion
chip out of the episode, a definite backstep in his characters evolution.
The sub-plot relationship between Picard and Anij was stronger than the plot
and left me wanting more, much more.  I got the impression from the movie
that the romantic sub-plot was once the plot of the show but at one point
they decided to change the focus, possibly in post-production.  The sub-plot
was the shining jewel of the entire movie.
On final note, I also liked the scenes between Riker (Jonathan Frakes) and
Troi.   They were cute, fun, and I feel like their relationship was a
longtime coming.
Acting
The performances in this movie were polished, a pure joy.  Patrick Stewart
played his role flawlessly, with an ease that was developed over more than
ten years of playing the same role.  F. Murray Abraham played the role of
Ru'afo with the malicious talent that he showed in Amadeus.  The stunning
Donna Murphy (Anij) was equally polished, it is easy to see why she won her
Tony Awards.
As for the secondary characters, Johnathan Frakes, Michael Dorn (Worf), and
Brent Spiner (Data) all delivered great performances once again.  LeVar
Burton was good in the movie but he wasn't given much time on the screen to
really shine.  Marina Sirtis was fantastic once again, I just wish they
would use her more often since she seems to steal most of the scene's that
she is in.  Unfortunately Gates McFadden (Crusher) wasn't given much screen
time, in fact, some of the Bak'u secondary actors were given more screen
time than McFadden.
Directing
Jonathan Frakes did another great job in directing this movie and it is easy
to see why he has been tapped to direct Total Recall II.  There was a time
in the film where he used a moving camera shot that seemed to distract from
the scene.
Sound
The sound effects were good (dispite not being filmed in THX).  The movie
sountract was not particularly memorable and there weren't any new theme's
in the film that stayed in my mind.
Effects
The special effects were better than most films.  There were a few times
where I could tell the effects were computer generated.  The stunts were
also well done, although once again there was a scene where the stunts
looked contrived (when the villagers were blown off of a bridge).
Recap
I really enjoyed this movie and plan on seeing it again.  The nature of the
movie (i.e.. a lighthearted adventure) didn't allow me to walk away with a
lasting emotional impression and that is the only real flaw with the movie.
I think that if they had focused more on the relationship between Picard and
Anij this flaw would have been resolved.
I think fan's of Star Trek will enjoy this movie more than non-fans.  This
is mainly because the fans finally get to see Picard fall in love and the
relationship between Troi and Riker is  growing again (yahoo!!!).
My only real disappointment with the movie was the way they got rid of
Data's emotion chip.  I have the impression that either Berman or Pillar
didn't like the idea of the emotion chip and want Data to de-evolve into a
character trying to discover his humanity again.

Author
Justin Felix
STAR TREK: INSURRECTION (1998)
A film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1998 Justin Felix.  
All of my film reviews are archived at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix  
This review also appears in the Shrubbery --
http://www.theshrubbery.prohosting.com/0199/movie3.html 
Written by Rick Berman and Michael Piller.  
Directed by Jonathan Frakes.  
Starring Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, F. Murray Abraham.  
Rated PG (contains violence and mild profanity) 102 mins.  
Synopsis:  Captain Picard and the crew of the starship Enterprise disobey
Federation orders and defend a peaceful community of 600, the Ba'ku, from
the evil Admiral Dougherty and Ru'afro.  The Enterprise crew, in the
meantime, experience the rejuvenating qualities of the Ba'ku homeworld: Lt.
Worf grows a pimple, Data sings opera pieces, Picard scores with a Ba'ku
chick, Riker shaves while sharing a bubblebath with Troi, and the Enterprise
women note their firmer breasts.
Comments:  "Star Trek: the Next Generation" was a hugely successful sequel
TV series to "Star Trek," a science fiction series which developed a devoted
fan following in the 1970s.  Even though it still enjoyed high ratings,
"Star Trek: the Next Generation" ended production after seven years so that
the cast could replace the original "Star Trek"'s cast in Paramount's film
franchise centering on the voyages of the starship Enterprise.  
STAR TREK: INSURRECTION is the ninth "Star Trek" movie and the third to
focus on the "Star Trek: The Next Generation" crew.  STAR TREK: INSURRECTION
qualifies as one of those movies Star Trek fans, such as myself, would rate
somewhere between "okay" and "good."  After STAR TREK V: THE FINAL FRONTIER,
a nearly awful movie almost as bad as the repugnant "Star Trek: Voyager" TV
series, "Star Trek" fans could probably swallow anything Paramount throws
out in the Trek film franchise.  I don't wish to spend this review comparing
INSURRECTION to the eight other Trek movies.  Most people reading this
probably haven't followed "Star Trek" anyway, so a comparison would seem
tedious at best.  Let me, thus, make my comparisons briefly so that it's out
of my system:  STAR TREK: INSURRECTION is not as good as the previous
installment, STAR TREK: FIRST CONTACT; STAR TREK: INSURRECTION's comic tone
may be best compared to STAR TREK IV: THE VOYAGE HOME; STAR TREK II: THE
WRATH OF KHAN is still the best Trek movie.
Okay.  Let's move to the movie itself.  STAR TREK: INSURRECTION infuses a
basic science fiction premise, humanity's exploration and colonization of
space, with a lot of lowbrow humor and witty oneliners.  This combination
works well more often than it fails, but when it does fail, the humor really
seems cheesy.  Much of this film appeals to Trek fans' nostalgic fondness
for the starship Enterprise's crew.  Audiences unfamiliar with Trek lore may
miss the significance of some plot points and may even become confused at
times.  
STAR TREK: INSURRECTION begins with scenes of the tranquil life on the Ba'ku
homeworld.  Forget the actors and special effects, the beautiful setting of
this movie, with its snowy mountaintops and verdant valleys, steals the
show.  This tranquility, however, is broken by Data, an android, who reveals
to the Ba'ku that they are being secretly monitored by the Federation and
their alien allies, the Son'a.  It seems that this world is a veritable
fountain of youth, sustaining its inhabitants indefinantly in a young,
healthy state.  The Enterprise crew, led by Captain Picard, investigates
Data's actions and uncovers a conspiracy between the Son'a and an Enterprise
admiral to relocate the Ba'ku and plunder the planet's youth-restoring
properties.  Sound pretty heavy?  It is, though this plot, anything but
unique and groundbreaking, is undermined by the film's constant barrage of
humor.  When going after Data, for instance, Picard sings an opera piece
with him (this is supposed to be cute and humorous).  In a much more funny
sequence, Work grows a large pimple on the side of his nose as a result of
his exposure to the Ba'ku homeworld, a pimple which his crewmates, try as
they might, cannot avoid looking at.
The acting in STAR TREK: INSURRECTION is, for the most part, pretty good.
Since they've been playing these characters for years, those portraying the
Enterprise crew reassume their roles effortlessly enough.  The terrific
actor Patrick Stewart plays Captain Jean-Luc Picard and delivers a moral
speech, Picard's trademark, with his usual aplomb.  Brent Spiner, another
fine actor, plays the android Data well enough again and provides the best
moments of comic relief in the film (though the old
android-wishing-to-be-human motif will tire some Trek fans familiar with the
routine from the TV series).  The supporting cast who appear in this movie
alone are also pretty good.  Despite many other critics' negative opinions,
F. Murray Abraham (the winner of an Academy Award for his performance in
AMADEUS) plays the major villain Ru'afro well enough.  Ru'afro reminds me,
somewhat, of the Baron Harkonnen in the 1984 film version of DUNE.  Like the
Baron, Ru'afro continuously has his skin looked after: it is stretched and
stapled by servants.  In one particularly memorable scene, Ru'afro becomes
very agitated, and his facial skin splits open and bleeds.  Ru'afro is no
Khan from STAR TREK II--the best Trek villain ever--but he is much better
than the forgettable Dr. Soran from STAR TREK: GENERATIONS.  (Okay, I
promise, no more comparisons.)  Donna Murphy must also be noted as a Ba'ku
woman, Anij, who Picard falls in love with.  Murphy is not a young woman
with a supermodel body; she is a mature woman with an attractive
countenance.  This is the type of woman whom Picard, for those who know the
character well, would be enchanted with.  In fact, the chemistry between
Murphy and Stewart works very well here.  A particular plot point involving
Anij's ability to slow time down, an ability which she shares with Picard,
becomes one of the most intriguing parts of the movie.
For as good as the actors and setting were, STAR TREK: INSURRECTION's
special effects were surprisingly disappointing.  They proved adequate,
sometimes barely, for a 1990s mainstream science fiction film, but they fell
way short of the standard Trek movie and paled in comparison to those seen
in the trailer for STAR WARS: THE PHANTOM MENACE (a trailer which reportedly
preceded many showings of INSURRECTION).  The space battles involving the
Enterprise and Sona ships, in particular, seemed trite and unsuspenseful,
and the final confrontation between Picard and Ru'afro took place on a
completely unconvincing interior of a satellite.  The new Enterprise itself,
only seen in this film and its predecessor, remains largely unexplored,
though its exterior doesn't look quite right for a reason I cannot explain.
Despite STAR TREK: INSURRECTION's frequent comic goofiness and occasional
substandard special effects, I enjoyed the film.  It maintains Roddenberry's
largely optimistic view of the future and rejects the gritty violence of its
predecessors, particularly STAR TREK: FIRST CONTACT (though, don't get me
wrong, the dark tones of Trek films like FIRST CONTACT can work very
successfully).  I'd recommend INSURRECTION as a matinee film for a Saturday
afternoon, especially for fans of Trek or science fiction in general.  Rated
PG, I can't see this film being objectionable to the viewing audience, young
or old.

Author
James Sanford

 There's a time-honored theory among hardcore viewers of the "Star Trek"
films: Every odd-numbered movie in the series stinks.
 For example, the first, "Star Trek: The Motion Picture," was a long-winded
yawn, but the follow-up, "The Wrath of Khan" was terrific fun. The third,
"Search For Spock," was mildly tedious, but the fourth, "The Journey Home,"
spiced up the usual formula with romance and wacky humor, as the Enterprise
crew tried to fit in in contemporary San Francisco. And so on and on.
 "Star Trek: Insurrection" is the ninth installment, following 1996's "First
Contact," which many regard as one of the very finest of the bunch.
"Insurrection" doesn't have the nightmarish visuals of that film, or as
strong a story, but it features enough goofy humor and clever plot twists to
qualify as the "Trek" that effectively breaks the curse.
 The movie's single best feature is its villain Ru'afo, played with scornful
malevolence by F. Murray Abraham; he can take his place alongside Alice
Krige's Borg Queen in "First Contact" and Ricardo Montalban's Khan as a
memorably creepy nemesis.
 Ru'afo is the leader of a race that ages so quickly they must frequently
subject themselves to the scariest onscreen face-lifts since Katherine
Helmond's nip and tuck in "Brazil." So who can blame him and his gang for
wanting to move to a planet where pulsating rings of radiation have allowed
the peaceful Baku to remain both youthfully spry and as mellow as the
inhabitants of Shangri-La?
 After meeting the Baku, most of whom talk like they've read too much Rod
McKuen ("A single moment in time can be a universe in itself," theorizes
one), Picard (Patrick Stewart) decides to prevent Ru'afo's planned
relocation of the tribe to another world. Cue the requisite explosions,
chases and perils.
 But though it moves swiftly, Michael Piller's screenplay takes a few breaks
for romance -- Picard and Riker (Jonathan Frakes, who also directed) each
get a love interest -- and laughs, as Data (Brett Spiner) rehearses "HMS
Pinafore" and Picard re-discovers the magic of the mambo. If the picture
errs on the side of touchy-feely occasionally, it still manages to regain
its bearings in time for a suspenseful climax that includes a major surprise
regarding Ru'afo.
 Though it's not quite top-flight, "Insurrection" is reasonable fun and its
tale of eternal life is quite fitting in this, the 20th anniversary of the
"Star Trek" movies. Live long and prosper, indeed.
James Sanford

Author
Scott Andresson
(Here goes my "Insurrection" review, which I thought I'd get out the way
before the ol' memory cells start to fade. Look out for the final three
episodes of DS9's sixth season within the next week or so...)
Although they've ditched the numerals, believe it or not "Star Trek:
Insurrection" is the ninth entry in the STAR TREK film legacy, and the
third to feature the cast of THE NEXT GENERATION. First of all, those of
you aware of the "curse of the odd-numbered TREK films" (ie, they're
somehow never as good as the even-numbered) may well be wondering whether
or not they've finally broken the jinx. The answer is both yes and no;
while "Insurrection" isn't on a par with the best of the TREK films, it's
certainly not the worst and beats the other odd-numbered entries, such as
"The Motion Picture" and "Generations" and certainly the dismal "The Final
Frontier". In itself "Insurrection" is a reasonably good film, if sometimes
a little patchy in execution.
Things start off with a beautifully-shot montage of scenes featuring the
serene village of the Ba'ku, a peaceful, spiritual race who have put aside
technology to build themselves a paradise. This is a particularly Trekkian
statement; that the future of mankind lies not so much in technology and
space as it does exploring the *real* Final Frontier -- the human spirit.
The Ba'ku represent what humanity is capable of becoming. Of course, they
are helped along by the fact thheir world contains rejuvenating radiation
which keeps them forever young. This energy captures the interest of the
Son'a (there's nothing like an apostrophe to make a name look cooler is
there? I'm half-thinking of changing my name to Sc'ott Andre'sson ;-)).
The Son'a are a dying race, and at first glimpse the exact opposite of the
Ba'ku -- materialistic, vain and bitter. I do suspect that if the Ba'ku
represent what humanity is capable of becoming, then the Sonn'a are what we
currently are (one can't help but notice we live in a very materialistic,
consumer-driven, dare I say *greedy* society). Incidentally there's a
clever convergence of the Ba'ku/Son'a storylines at the end which further
emphasise the choice that each of us has today (we can be a Ba'ku or a
Son'a, to put it quite simply). Yeah, well I won't go into the
philosophical side of it too deeply, needless to say this is an
intelligent, sophisticated story with a very relevant, positive message for
today. The Son'a attempt to relocate the Ba'ku in a bid to use the planet's
regenerating energy and this is nicely paralleled with the tragedy of the
Native American West. STAR TREK is often at its best when it explores
deeper issues in a positive light and although this is h!
ardly TREK at its finest (by a long shot) this is a pretty good attempt.
Given that the majority of sci-fi films nowadays have about as much depth
and I.Q. as a blade of grass (which in some cases is probably unfair on the
grass!) that's a welcome thing, indeed.
Unfortunately, while the basic storyline is strong and intelligent, the
film flounders a bit on its execution. Generally it was fine, but on
occasion rather patchy. For a start, there was *way* too much
"technobabble". Now it's fine in very small doses, because it makes the
characters look like they can do their job, but particularly towards the
end, there was far too much "scientific" mumbo-jumbo, constituting plot.
Incidentally, Michael Piller's script was generally proficient, although
the dialogue sometimes lacked that all-important sparkle. There were a
number of rather wordy expositions which I guess were necessary, but there
was perhaps a slight predisposition to *tell* instead of *show*.
It transpires that the Federation (represented here by the sleazy Admiral
Dougherty, the latest in a long line of corrupt Starfleet Admirals) are
conspiring to work with the Son'a to move the Ba'ku in order to share the
secret of the planet's "fountain of youth". Whilst intriguing, the
conspiracy aspect wasn't handled as deftly as it has been before on THE
NEXT GENERATION and particularly DEEP SPACE NINE. But any attempt to inject
some shades of grey and make the good guys seem less cardboard is always
welcome. And it wasn't an especially clear-cut issue, either -- the Son'a
were a dying species and as Admiral Dougherty said, the planet's radiation
would have helped billions of people.  Would relocating the Ba'ku really
have been so much given that? Of course, I'd tend to side with Picard and
the Ba'ku (as we're obviously meant to) but I'm just going to show that
there's a degree of moral ambiguity and certainly no easy answers. Yet one
of the film's main problems is that it d!
oesn't capitalise on this, and there's absolutely no hint of doubt on
Picard's side -- for him there *is* an easy answer! It would have been a
lot more dramatically-sound had his decision been made tougher. DS9 does an
excellent job of portraying rounded, three-dimensional characters by
instilling a degree of moral ambiguity. "Insurrection" would have benefited
from that, and it would certainly have made Picard and co seem a bit less
cardboard (and more human) under the circumstances.
Incidentally, I'd heard that they were aiming to give "Insurrection" a
lighter tone, likened to "Star Trek IV: The Voyage Home". I'm not quite
sure they pulled it off; the comedy didn't *blend* as well as it did in
"First Contact" and while there were some nice amusing touches, this aspect
was a bit hit-and-miss. I got a giggle out of the exchange on the shuttle;
Picard: "Do you know Gilbert and Sullivan?" Worf: "I have not had the
opportunity to meet all the new crew." Picard: "They're *composers*,
Worf!", but having Patrick Stewart and Brent Spiner singing a song from HMS
Pinafore was...icky. The gag about Data repeating Beverly and Troi's
comment about "have you noticed your boobs getting firmer?" to Worf *was*
funny, even though it made Data look a bit dim in the process!
The rest of the comedy was largely down to the characterisation of the
regulars. The writers evidently tried to have some fun and it works to
varying degrees as the crew are affected by the planet's rejuvenating
radiation. Riker and Troi prance about like gormless teenagers, resuming a
relationship they had several years prior to the television series while
Riker finally gets rid of the beard -- and not a moment too soon for Troi.
Jonathan Frakes and Marina Sirtis have a nice, light chemistry and their
scenes togetheer are pleasant enough, even if none of it felt especially
true-to-character. Geordi's regaining his sight was rather touching,
however brief. And while Picard loses a few wrinkles around his neck,
there's no sign of any hair sprouting up! Was he always bald? Poor Beverly
again has next to nothing to do -- was it even worth having Gates McFadden
there at all when she was so superfluous to the plot? Worf seems to be the
butt of much of the humour with most of the jo!
kes on him and his pimple as he once again undergoes Klingon puberty.
Speaking of Worf, it would have been nice to have had some reference to
Dax, or better yet, an appearance (even just a brief one) by Terry Farrell
herself! Even a small cameo by TREK's most engaging, charismatic actress
certainly wouldn't have gone astray. By the way, where was Quark?! I
thought he was supposed to have a quick cameo? And although I spotted Max
Grodenchik's name in the end credits (billed as "alien ensign"), I
evidently missed him. D'oh!
Anyway, "Insurrection" had two little sub-stories alongside the main plot.
The first, Picard's relationship with Anij (Donna Murphy) was amiable, if a
bit insipid (it would have been nice if they'd actually *kissed*! Even just
a peck on the cheek). Stewart and Murphy didn't quite have the chemistry to
make it work, but it was quite sweet nonetheless (I loved the bit with the
hummingbird!). And I liked Anij -- here we have a mature, strong,
intelligent woman who doesn't have to display an acre of flesh or become a
vulnerable damsell in distress (though, yes, she did get injured at one
point).
Another sub-story was shared by Data and the kid (can't remember his name).
Anyone who's ever watched THE NEXT GENERATION will immediately experience
deja vu -- the Data-befriends-frightened-child storyline was a stock TNG
cliche. Apparently its only reason for being here was to up tthe "cuteness"
factor. It was harmless enough, but I think I'll pass. As far as Data was
concerned, there was more character *regression* than development. Have the
writers already tired of his "emotion chip" (which, we're told, he didn't
take with him on this trip)?
The performances are all enjoyable, even though the script doesn't really
tax anyone too much. Patrick Stewart does his usual great job, and the rest
of the regulars are obviously having some fun. The guest cast were
generally solid; Donna Murphy did a good job as Anij, even if she was a
little low-key for some tastes, and Anthony Zerbe made a suitably slimy
Admiral Dougherty. As Ru'afo, the leader of the Son'a, F Murray Abraham was
a rather forgettable villain (mind you, it didn't help that all the Son'a
looked virtually the identical) although he did have his moments (one of
them *not* being that laughably exaggerated "Nooooooooooooooooo!!!" when
his mission is aborted).
Once again Jonathan Frakes does an exemplary job directing. He's certainly
got an eye for visual flair, and whilst he's not exactly James Cameron
quite yet, for a relative beginner I'm very impressed. On the other hand
the special effects were surprisingly mixed -- whilst the explosions were
quite spectacular, the close-ups of the ships were unconvincing. The
robotic "tagging" devices llooked fake and the shot of Data in the Son'a
ship attacking Ru'afo was unintentionally funny. I assume they used CGI,
which has its virtues (like I said, the explosions were great), but as far
as the ships go, actual models are far more convincing. I did love the
music, though! Jerry Goldsmith is one of Hollywood's finest composers and
he does an absolutely tremendous job. His opening theme was superlative and
he keeps the momentum going right through the film.
One niggle I had with "Insurrection" was it's climax; not so much because
of what happened, but more the *way* it happened. The final ten minutes are
a flurry of beaming on and off different ships, activating particle
collectors, being transported aboard holographic ships, chasing the bad guy
before he can carry out his planÖoh, and it's all seasoned with a dash of
technobabble, of course! Thing is, you have to concentrate exceptionally
hard if you're to follow the plot. There's fast-paced and then there's
so-fast-paced-it's-difficult-to-follow.
* OK, so Riker piloted the Enterprise manually using what looked like a
home PC *joystick*?! I'm not quite sure whether that was meant to be funny
or taken seriously...
* The "Collector" ship immediately reminded me of the Bajoran light ship
Sisko built in DS9's "Explorers". The "sails" looked almost identical. Oh,
and did it strike anyone else as odd that this technology was utterly
beyond the grasp of Starfleet?
* There were about three references to the Dominion. I had hoped that the
film would tie-in closer with the events of the past season's DS9. There
was no mention that the Federation was actually at war, but an interesting
observation on Ru'afo's part that the Federation may be crumbling. Picard
also mentioned "negotiations with the Dominion" -- huh? And on researching
the Son'a, Riker claims that they manufacture the drug Ketracel-white. This
strikes me as extremelyy unlikely, as it's previously been established that
the drug is specific to the Founders, who use it to control the Jem'Hadar.
* Did I mention that the location work was absolutely gorgeous? Well, it
was! I wonder where it was? Wouldn't mind a holiday thereÖ
* The scenes of Son'a skin-stretching were rather vile. Mind you, they
don't bear a patch on the Vidiians from VOYAGER (who would just as happily
graft *your* face onto theirs!). Admiral Dougherty met with a particularly
nasty end -- in fact I'm surprised the film was only a PG certificate.
That's about it, I think you get the idea by now! I'm not sure how
accessible it is for those completely unfamiliar with TREK and I suspect
the uninitiated might go away feeling rather more confused than they were
to begin with! But as far as I'm concerned, "Insurrection" may have its
flaws and it's certainly not TREK at its best, but it's still an
intelligent, thoughtful film that works reasonably well. The only major
disappointment was that they never blew up the Enterprise at the end! It
has to be one of the ugliest ships I've ever seen on TREK. Ah, well,
there's always the next movie...or the one after that...or the one after
that...

Author
Steve Kong
If you're a Trekkie, serious or casual, you'll most likely know about the
curse of the odd-numbered Star Trek films. But, for those of you who don't,
here's a quick rundown of the movies. Number one was overly long. Number
two is the best of the films featuring the original crew. Number three, was
there a number three? Number four was a light-hearted and fun adventure.
Number five, well, what can I say? William Shatner directed it. Number six
was exciting. Number seven suffered because of Kirk and a mediocre story.
Number eight, First Contact, is the best of the series - there's no beating
the Borg as an enemy. Now, we have number nine - will it suffer the wrath
of the odd-number?
Unlike First Contact, Insurrection is more light-hearted. The film reminded
me a lot of The Voyage Home (IV) because it doesn't take itself too
seriously. There are quite a few laughs in this film; I would say a few too
many. This veers the film from light-hearted to campy.
Insurrection opens with Lt. Commander Data (Brent Spiner) on a field study
of the Ba'ku, a Luddite-like culture. Data goes berserk and takes hostages.
The Enterprise is called to come get Data before he is put out of
commission. When the Enterprise arrives, a series of events thickens the
plot. We find out that the Federation has made new partners with the Son'a
and are studying the Ba'ku. The Son'a have ulterior motives for the study,
though.
It seems that the planet the Ba'ku inhabit is surrounded by rings of a
substance that continuously regenerates the cells of living organisms. This
substance is of interest to the leader of the Son'a, Ru'afo (F. Murray
Abraham), and is seen by Admiral Dougherty (Anthony Zerbe) as a saviour for
the Federation. What could be better than the eternal life provided by the
rings of the Ba'ku planet?
What Captain Picard (Patrick Stewart) finds is a ring of conspiracy within
the Son'a/Federation partnership. He finds that the partnership is in
violation of the Prime Directive (the Federation cannot interfere with
technologically limited civilizations).
The main theme of Insurrection is so obvious that unless you're brain dead,
it'll hit you like a two-by-four between the eyes. It's obvious from the
first twenty minutes that the writers are drawing parallels to the
Europeans invading North America and ridding the land of the Native Americans.
One fun thing about going to a Star Trek film on opening night is the
atmosphere of the crowd. The Star Trek crowd is different than all others.
There is a loose Trekkie bond between people who don't know each other.
While waiting, my friend Aaron and I talked to some beer-drinking Trekkies
about different cameos in the different films (Christian Slater, Kirstie
Alley, Kelsey Grammer, Christopher Lloyd) and in front of us was a guy
dressed as Riker. There's nothing like going to a Star Trek film on opening
night.
As for the film itself, I thought it was a bit too campy. It was an
entertaining film, but there were a few flaws. First, and foremost, there
was too much comedy in the film. I like to laugh, but Insurrection felt
more like a comedy than a Star Trek film. From Worf's puberty to Riker and
Troi running around like horny teenagers, this film just felt weird.
Second, the special effects were awful - a full step behind those of First
Contact. The new Enterprise looked like a cheezy model bought from a
discount store - as did most of the ships in the film. I'm not sure if the
production ran out of money for special effects or what, but they were not
up to par with those presented in First Contact. And last, the plot felt
like an overly long version of a TV episode.
The two good things about the film were director Jonathon Frakes and music
composer Jerry Goldsmith. Frakes is able to keep the film moving at a brisk
pace and Goldsmith is able to integrate the score into the film seamlessly.
Goldsmith is one of the hardest working composers in Hollywood and I'm
always delighted to hear his work.
The best performer in the film is Stewart. As always Stewart is a joy to
see onscreen because he never fails to entertain. Kudos to Stewart for a
great performance in Insurrection. Also kudos to Brent Spiner for another
funny performance as Lt. Commander Data. Spiner gets some of the best
moments of the film and he juices each and every one of them for its full
entertainment value. F. Murray Abraham's Ru'afo is one of the less
memorable bad guys in the Star Trek series. He doesn't even come close to
Ricardo Montalban as Kahn in The Wrath of Khan.
All in all, Insurrection is not a bad film, but it still does suffer a
little from the curse of being an odd-numbered film. I was fairly
entertained by the end of the film, but not as much as I was after seeing
First Contact. Though, I admit it is a hard task to follow up a brilliant
film like First Contact. Catch Insurrection at matinee or on video.
[Rated PG  Some violence. Running Time: 103 Minutes]
 recipe for a hard boiled review:  one egg, two cups water, a pot,
 a helluva attitude, and a guy who loves the cinema.
 i'm your hard boiled movie guide.

Author
Bill Chambers
           -a review by Bill Chambers ( wchamber@netcom.ca )
 (Merry Christmas from Film Freak Central! http://filmfreakcentral.net )
Everything about this ninth Trek movie seems on the cheap, from the
Roger Corman-grade special effects to its highly derivative and ugly ad
campaign (the poster is nearly identical to that of Star Trek VI: The
Undiscovered Country). But Piller's not-quite-half-baked screenplay
should ultimately claim responsibility for Insurrection's failure. I'm
about to give the same advice to Rick Berman and co. as I've given to
the financiers of James Bond movies: it's time to breathe life into this
workhorse by hiring solid genre writers and a real director. (While
we're at it, put that visor back on LaForge!)
For three hundred years, the Ba'ku species (who look just like humans)
have lived on a ringed-planet that might as well be called the Fountain
of Youth. Six hundred of them occupy the Briar Patch, the area affected
by metaphasic radition, a positive energy that reverses the aging
process in the elderly. But evil Ru'afo (this is probably Abraham's last
stop before performing "Amadeus" at a dinner theatre near you), leader
of the Son'a (who look just like burn victims after reconstructive
surgery), wants to relocate the Ba'ku and movie his people onto the
Briar Patch in their place, in order to replenish his dying breed. The
Federation is all for this, but Picard feels this is a direct violation
of the Prime Directive: to not interfere with the development of an
alien race. (Never mind that the Ba'ku didn't exactly evolve-they went
wandering in the universe one day and stumbled upon the magic world.)
Every time Frakes gives an interview lately, he seems to top whatever
ludicrous statement he last gave regarding this installment. He has
called it a comedy, a thinking man's picture, a throwback to the old
series, and, most grievously, he has likened it to a John Ford western.
(I presume that's some John Ford he went to school with, not the
director of The Searchers.) He has also gone on record as saying
Paramount recut the film from his version. That's no excuse-someone
generated this footage. Muddy cinematography and sitcom sets are the
least of its problems; Star Trek: Insurrection appears to have been
beamed in from the planet Plotholia. Consider such curiosities...
Picard's love interest, Anij (Donna Murphy), can slow things down by
staring at them (such as a waterfall or falling rocks)-her scientific
explanation for this? "Don't ask." Worf gets a pimple (he's
re-experiencing Klingon puberty thanks to the time-defying atmosphere),
LaForge regains his eyesight (trust me, Levar Burton's real eyes are
scarier than those electronic lenses he wore in First Contact) and Troi
brags about her firm boobs, but Picard remains as bald as an android's
butt.
Most suspiciously, what exactly is the problem with letting this
endangered race have a little fun in the sun? The filmmakers cloud the
issue with some nonsense about a family feud of sorts, and they also
turn Ru'afo into a completely power-mad superfreak, just so the
characters will have something to do in the climax. (And if you've seen
Return of the Jedi, you've seen the ending of this movie.) Didn't Picard
himself previously disobey the Prime Directive when he prevented the
Borg from assimilating millions?
Frakes lucked out with First Contact, and repeat viewings of that film
reveal the seeds of what went wrong in his direction of Insurrection: he
has no sense of comic timing, and he mines for acting chemistry where
none exists. (Take a look at the painful "Troi gets drunk" scene in FC
and you'll get the general idea of Insurrection's unsuccessfully jokey
and hollow tone.) Even the worst Shatner and co. Treks, like The Final
Frontier, maintained a watchability thanks to the effortless, charming
comaraderie between Kirk, Spock, and Bones.
Neither First Contact nor Insurrection has any idea what to do with
Crusher (Gates McFadden, whom I must say maintains a fabulous physique),
Troi, or LaForge. And all three Next Generation films spend too much
time on Data, who is the franchise's answer to Urkel. Need a cheap
laugh? Have Data say something sexual, or start singing, or lift up a
four hundred pound boulder as if it's the hunk of styrofoam it really
is. Here's my proposed title for number 10: Data Star Data Trek: Data
Data Data Data Data. In this movie, Data will become preoccupied with
learning to blow his nose, while Crusher and Troi watch silently from
500 yards away and LaForge points his sinister gaze at the android in
doubly robotic observation.
Star Trek: Insurrection had one nice, eerie, silent moment that hints at
a better, darker film. I'm not saying all of them should be Star Trek
II: The Wrath of Khan, but this one boldly went where no movie should go
again.

Author
Seth Bookey
Seen on 19 December with Lothlorien at the SONY Village East for $8.75
Ever see a movie where too much and too little was happening
simultaneously? That's the problem with *Star Trek: Insurrection* in a
nutshell. Or perhaps it just that, as Lothlorien put it, it's just a long
episode of the TV show (that being *Star Trek: The Next Generation*). This
is the ninth *Star Trek* movie, and the third of the "next generation."
The plot, in a nutshell: On a ringed planet, the Baku are an agrarian race
resembling humans in every way who turn out to be ageless Luddites, having
eshewed technology centuries before. Their activities are observed by the
Federation and its new allies, the Sona--observed unseen until android Lt.
Cmdr. Data (Brent Spiner) goes berserk, does't respond to orders and
shoots at the secret HQ until its cloaking device fails.
Meanwhile, it becomes obvious that the Sona and the Federation are in an
unholy alliance as they plot to relocate the Baku and capture the helpful
radiation from the planet's rings. Captain Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick
Stewart) is appalled by the plan to relocate the 600 Baku, as it
interferes with the Prime Directive to not interfere with cultures, and he
leads a revolt on humanitarian grounds. That, and he has a love affair of
sorts with a 300-year-old Baku woman, Anij (Donna Murphy) who doesn't look
a day older than 45. Must be that Oil of Olay.
Meanwhile, Data "learns how to be a child" from the 12-year-old Artim (),
who doesn't look a day older than 13.
That's all well and good. However, there are two problems: The
less-than-compelling story limps along, and an overabundance of explosions
and shootouts that don't distract you from a lack of pacing and story
development.
What fans of the show will like are the in jokes and character development
of their favorites. However, many dramatic moments are missed in a
somewhat confusing and unfocused array of twists that occur during
aforementioned spectacles (shooting, explosions, mass migrations, chase
sequences, etc).
What *is* entertaining here is the dialogue, the relationships between the
established characters, the comedy (e.g., Picard and Worf (Michael Dorn)
singing Gilbert & Sullivan to the out of control Data), and little touches
(like Worf undergoing, again, the pains of Klingon adolescence on the
rejuvenating planet).
The special effects are scattershot as well, although the Sona's hi-tech
versions of reconstructive surgery, administered by intergalactic versions
of video babes a la Robert Palmer's "Addicted to Love" girls, is amusing.
The Sona, by the way, look like living mummies, and ooze body fluids and
crack their skin when they get mad.
The performances range from adequate to entertaining, with the best ones
turned in by Stewart, Spiner, and F. Murray Abraham as the vengeful Sona
leader Ru'afro.
A final problem that actor and director Jonathan Frakes (a/k/a Cmdr.
William Riker) should take note of in the future: Don't shoot so much in
direct sunlight. Much of the action takes place in daylight on what surely
looks like the lot where they filmed all the Planet of the Apes movies.
Sci-fi often works better with the dark blanket of outerspace and the
artificial lights of the spacecraft and the computers. Never has daylight
seemed so... dull.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Author
Marty Mapes
**1/2 (out of 4) There is a rule of thumb that says odd-numbered Star
Trek movies are bad, and even-numbered ones are good (INSURRECTION is
Star Trek 9). I really hate that rule because at some point it becomes a
self-fulfilling prophecy. People look for flaws in odd movies and
OVERlook them in even movies. STAR TREK: INSURRECTION is, to some
extent, a victim of this perception, particularly from that most
ubiquitous critic, Roger Ebert.
This time, the film opens on an idyllic little planet with kids
frolicking in stacks of hay. Commander Data is part of an invisible crew
that's monitoring the progress of this civilization. Without warning,
Data apparently goes berserk, firing on the other anthropologists and
exposing himself and the other scientists to the unsuspecting
civilization.
Concerned (but strangely, not shocked), Captain Picard ditches a boring
diplomatic party and takes the Enterprise to the planet where Data was
working. Picard heads out in a shuttlecraft to capture the rogue
android.
Sure enough, there was a perfectly logical explanation for his behavior.
It turns out that a blow to his head (from one of the other
anthropologists, no less) disabled Data's neocortex, leaving his base
programming to kick in. Since his base programming says to protect the
innocent, the crew of the Enterprise is left wondering what the
anthropologists were doing. Why would Data's base, unreasoning altruism
dictate that he blow their cover?
Turns out the Ba'ku, the "anthropologists," were not merely studying the
Son'a, the planet-dwellers -- they were trying to figure out how to
steal their fountain of youth. The way to steal the rejuvenating
"waters" would involve destroying both the local solar system AND the
source of the fount. Ordinarily, this would be a space no-no.
But since the Son'a, it is learned, are space-age settlers, and not a
native, developing culture, the Federation considers them exempt from
the protections of the Prime Directive. (For the uninitiated, the Prime
Directive was conceived by Star Trek creator Gene Roddenberry during the
Vietnam War. It says that the Federation cannot interfere with the
affairs of developing civilizations). The crew of the Enterprise
disagrees. They think this unique culture should be protected. Thus the
film's title: insurrection.
Although this film is actually a mediocre entry into the series, this
moral question is worth talking about. Is it okay to move 600 people off
their homeland so that billions of other people might benefit?
The Federation says yes. More influentially, Roger Ebert says yes, and
he even got the cast of the
film to say yes, although he phrased the question in a way that slanted
the responses.
Ebert failed to take into account three key points. One, these billions
of lives won't be SAVED, they will merely be IMPROVED. Two, extracting
the youth-water destroys its natural source. Three, there is no
guarantee that, once extracted, the stuff can be replicated.
I'd like to propose a comparable, modern-day question. Would it be okay
to destroy a rainforest (where some Quaker settlers have been living for
hundreds of years), to build a road, to get to a small puddle of
something like aspirin? Everyone on the planet can have a little taste,
but there's no guarantee we can synthesize it in a laboratory once the
supply is gone.
Seems like a big waste of resources, a situation ripe for corruption,
and a rash destruction of something that future generations may be able
to better understand and use. Seems like the sane, sensible thing, would
be to leave this fountain of youth intact for further study by future
generations.
At least, that's what I think Roddenberry would say.  
Aside from the moral dilemma, STAR TREK: INSURRECTION is alright. It
wasn't my favorite, and in fact, Data's naďve antics were starting to
get on my nerves. It will probably fade into obscurity, as many of the
other odd-numbered movies have.
It's just too bad that the Star Trek Rule of Thumb had to gain
credibility, because it may doom 50% of all future Trek movies to
failure.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.moviehabit.com

Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring Patrick Stewart; Jonathan Frakes; Brent Spiner & LeVar Burton
Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart) and the rest of the crew of the U.S.S.
Enterprise are back for their third outing in the ninth film based on the
1960's series, Star Trek. Gone are Kirk, Spock and McCoy and in their wake
in the very able and very talented cast from Star Trek: The Next Generation.
As usual, a crisis is brewing and it is up to the crew of the Enterprise to
make the galaxy safe again. This time out The United Federation of Planets
and an alien race led by F. Murray Abraham are trying to move some colonists
off a planet against the colonist's will. It turns out that this planet is
the fountain of youth and the Federation and their alien buddies feel that
is should be used for the good of everyone and not just a few hundred
colonists. Of course Picard feels that this sort of treachery is wrong, so
he disobeys direct orders and vows to help protect the colonists.
Insurrection is a lighter movie than the last two Star Trek films. The film
focuses on the lofty question of whether the rights of society as a whole
outweighs the rights of a small group. In this respect it gets back to the
roots of Star Trek by disguising social commentary as science fiction. It
doesn't do a bad job, other than it tries to inject too much humor into the
story line. Many of the jokes are your typical inside Star Trek-Fan-Only
jokes, while many of the others just fall flat. The other criticism that I
had with the story was that it ignores common sense. There are only a few
hundred people on this whole planet, why do they have to be moved? The
explanation is that the planet has to be bombarded with deadly radiation so
that this fountain of youth effect will be strong enough to help heal F.
Murray Abraham's aliens who number only a couple of dozen. So the basic
story line is bad enough in that we have a few hundred being booted out for
a few billion, at least that's plausible. But in reality we have a few
hundred being moved for the benefits of a few dozen, which makes no sense
whatsoever.
The other little hiccup in logic is the inclusion of Worf (Michael Dorn),
the trusty Klingon. Worf was on Star Trek: The Next Generation, so they want
to include him in the films. No problem so far. Worf is now a character of
Star Trek: Deep Space Nine, so the writers have to find a way to have him
show up. In the last Star Trek movie, First Contact, the included Worf in a
credible fashion, in this one, the writers are so lazy that the completely
gloss over why he is even in the movie. What little explanation they do give
is so small that you would have missed it if you weren't hanging on every
word on the screen.
My minor problems with the movie aside, Star Trek: Insurrection does have an
overwhelming number of good points as compared to its bad ones. While many
of the jokes do miss the mark, many are pretty good, even for non-trekkies.
The special effects are among the best for the Star Trek series. The action
is plentiful and well done. This is a very good-looking movie. It should
come as no surprise to anyone who ever watched Star Trek: The Next
Generation that the acting is first rate. It is very obvious that these
actors have been working together for over a decade. They interact with each
other with a skill that few other ensemble casts can muster.
Most Star Trek fans probably will not be disappointed with this latest film
in the series. If you've always hated Star Trek, there is nothing here that
is going to change your mind. Star trek: Insurrection is not the best film
in the series, but it is good enough to dispel the long standing tradition
of the odd numbered films in the series being far inferior to the even
numbered ones.

Author
Kevin Patterson
If nothing else, STAR TREK: INSURRECTION should convince people that the
supposed curse on odd-numbered installments of the TREK series has been
lifted. It more or less plays like an episode of the "Next Generation" TV
series with a bigger budget, but that's not necessarily a bad thing. While
maybe not the best of the four TREK series, "The Next Generation" was
certainly the most politically idealistic and can lay claim to two of the
franchise's most consistently interesting characters: Captain Jean-Luc
Picard (Patrick Stewart) and the android Lieutanant Commander Data (Brent
Spiner).
Screenwriter Michael Piller, who has been involved in all three of the new
STAR TREK series, wisely puts Picard and Data at the center of the action
for most of the film. As the film begins, Data is on a survey mission with
a team from Starfleet secretly observing a race known as the Ba'ku, who
have abandoned their technology in favor of a return to a simpler, more
agricultural way of life. Suddenly Data turns against the other team
members, exposing their secret observation post and telling the Ba'ku that
the team are their enemies. Picard and the rest of the Enterprise crew are
called in to handle the situation, and after apprehending Data, discover
that he suffered an injury which rendered inactive all of his artificial
brain except for his moral/ethical subroutines.
Soon the situation becomes clear: there is a special kind of radiation
emitted by the ring system of the Ba'ku planet which prevents the aging
process. A rogue Starfleet Admiral, along with some seedy aliens, have
decided to move the Ba'ku against their will in order to take advantage of
this radiation. When these plans are discovered, Picard objects on the
grounds that they would be violating Starfleet's Prime Directive, which
states that all alien civilizations must be allowed to develop
independently. The impatient aliens then prepare to kill the Ba'ku as well
as the Enterprise crew. From this point on, INSURRECTION follows the
reliable formula for a STAR TREK action/adventure story by splitting up the
crew between one group on a planet and/or a hostile spaceship while the
other group fights a space battle with the aliens. In this case, Picard,
Data, and several other Enterprise officers go to the planet to protect the
Ba'ku from the alien onslaught, while First Officer William Riker (Jonathan
Frakes, who also directed) takes command of the Enterprise.
The biggest success of INSURRECTION is the way it handles some of the
philosophical questions underlying this latest TREK adventure. At this
point in the storyline, Picard and his crew have been relegated mostly to
diplomatic duty, as Starfleet's war with the invading Dominion (a story arc
from the "Deep Space Nine" TV series) has strained their resources and
forced them to concentrate on the political rather than on exploration and
science. As he spends more time with the Ba'ku, we can see that Picard is
considering that he might prefer to return to a simpler form of
exploration, that of human relationships and community, given that he
probably won't be getting back to quasars, solar systems, and wormholes any
time soon. The use of technology has always been a source of controversy
and moral dilemma in the STAR TREK universe, but I don't recall ever seeing
the technology-driven futuristic idealism of the TREK franchise questioned
so directly.
If anything, the filmmakers push this aspect a little too far, as the
screenplay seems to be so ga-ga over the utopian community of the Ba'ku
that it never questions the morality of their decision to exile anyone who
wants to take another try at a technological society. Aside from that, the
only other noticeable problem is the often sophomoric humor that arises out
of the effects of the anti-aging radiation on the Enterprise crew. The
giggly romance between Riker and ship counselor Deanna Troi (Marina Sirtis)
is so corny that one wonders if Frakes and Sirtis had been receiving some
radiation treatment themselves when they performed these scenes, and Picard
breaking out into a samba dance in his quarters isn't far behind on the
silliness meter. There is some slightly more credible, and seemingly less
radiation-induced, attraction between Picard and a Ba'ku woman, but it
still comes off as a movie romance rather than a real one.
STAR TREK: INSURRECTION is certainly not the best of the movie series:
FIRST CONTACT and THE VOYAGE HOME, at the very least, are clearly superior,
and a case could be made for THE UNDISCOVERED COUNTRY, THE WRATH OF KHAN,
and maybe even THE SEARCH FOR SPOCK as well. Nevertheless, its entertaining
mix of sci-fi adventure, character development, and philosophical questions
about humankind and its future makes it easy to see why STAR TREK has
indeed managed to live long and prosper.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
Film Reviews archived at:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html
